<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89927-0029 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.9-27-89.f2.A1028</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 186 / Wednesday, September 27,1989 / Proposed Rules<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Federal Railroad Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">49 CFR Parts 217, 219, and 225 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[FRA Docket No. RSOR-6, Notice No. 24] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 2130-AA43 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Alcohol/Drug Regulations: Proposed Amendments </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Federal Railroad Administration (FRA), DOT.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Notice of Proposed rulemaking.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>FRA issues a notice of proposed rulemaking requestingcomments on proposed amendments to its rule on Control of Alcohol and DrugUse in Railroad Operations and related provisions of other rules. Theseamendments are necessary to make improvements in the regulatory programin light of experience and prior public comment, to correct and clarifycertain provisions, and to conform the original provisions of the alcohol/drugrule to the amendments issued with the random testing rule in Novemberof 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>Written comments must be received no later than October27, 1989. Comments received after that date will be considered to the extentpossible without incurring additional expense or delay. FRA will hold apublic hearing on the proposed amendments prior to the closing of the commentperiod on a date to be announced in a future notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>Written comments should be submitted to the DocketClerk, Office of the Chief Counsel (RCC-30), FRA, Room 8201, 400 7th StreetSW., Washington, DC 20590. Persons desiring to be notified that their writtencomments have been received by the FRA should submit a stamped, self-addressedpostcard with their comments. The Docket Clerk will indicate on the postcardthe date on which the comments were received and will return the card tothe addressee. Written comments will be available for examination, bothbefore and after the closing date for comments, during regular businesshours in Room 8201 of the Nassif Building at the above address.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Mr. Walter C. Rockey, Jr., ExecutiveAssistant to the Associate Administrator for Safety (RRS-3), FRA, Washington,DC 20590, (Telephone: (202) 366-0897), Dr. Sam Holley, Alcohol andamp; DrugProgram Manager (RRs-10), Office of Safety Enforcement, FRA, Washington,DC 20590, (Telephone: (202) 366-0501) or Grady Cothen, Special Counsel(RCC-4), FRA, Washington, DC 20590, (Telephone: (202) 366-0767).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>The following abbreviations are usedin this notice: <T3>BAC: </T3>Blood alcohol concentration. <T3>DOT Procedures: </T3>Transportation Workplace Drug Testing Procedures(49 CFR part 40; 53 FR 47002, Nov. 21, 1988). <T3>MRO: </T3>Medical Review Officer. <T3>NIDA: </T3>National Institute on Drug Abuse, Alcohol, Drug Abuse andMental Health Administration (the unit within the Department of Healthand Human Services responsible for urine drug testing standards and certificationof laboratories for the Federal workplace). On November 21, 1988, FRA published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>a final rule (53 FR 47102) making certain amendmentsto its regulations on control of alcohol and drug use in railroad operations(49 CFR part 219). The amendments added requirements for random testing,a prohibition on non-medical use of controlled substances at any time (a``drug-free rule''), and new urine drug testing requirements incorporatingthe DOT Procedures (53 FR 47002). In issuing the random testing rule and associated amendments, FRA indicatedthat further rulemaking would be required to conform the existing provisionsof the alcohol/drug regulations to the new requirements. FRA also indicatedthat it intended to address a number of issues that had emerged duringadministration of the existing program, including issues identified throughan informal safety inquiry designed to review first-year operations (<T3>see </T3>52 FR 2118; Jan. 20, 1987). FRA has withheld action in theseareas in anticipation of final judicial action in pending litigation. Withthe issuance of a Supreme Court decision completing resolution of challengesto the 1985 FRA rule (<T3>Skinner </T3>v. <T3>Railway Labor Executives' Association</T3>, 109 S. Ct. 1402 (March21, 1989)), FRA is now able to address remaining issues in light of thedecision and without further complicating or delaying the judicial process.The proposed amendments would accomplish the following general objectives:andbullet; Clarify certain rule language that has not been uniformly wellunderstood in practice and make technical corrections. andbullet; Conform prior rule language regarding testing procedures for pre-employmentand reasonable cause tests to accommodate adoption of the DOT Procedures(the HHS Guidelines for Federal Workplace Drug Testing Programs, as adapted).andbullet; Add enhanced conditions and safeguards for urine and blood alcoholtesting that is permitted (or offered as an employee option) under thecurrent rule.andbullet; Ensure that employees are properly informed when tests are conductedunder the FRA rules and that the reason for each test is clearly communicated.andbullet; Conform prior rule language to reflect adoption of the drug-freerule (andSection; 219.102). andbullet; Refine the criteria for post-accident toxicological testing byensuring that tests are conducted after passenger train accidents involvingpersonal injuries, while excusing testing after events clearly resultingfrom natural causes (``Acts of God''). andbullet; Strengthen the pre-employment testing program by specifying theaction an employer shall take when non-authorized drug use is detectedand by requiring tests when employees transfer from non-covered to coveredservice. andbullet; Establish uniform minimum standards for handling employees determinedto have violated the rules based on required or authorized tests, buildingon the same principles used in the random testing rulemaking. andbullet; Consolidate similar provisions scattered across the rule intoprovisions of general applicability and otherwise improve organizationof the rule text. FRA also requests comment on whether the prohibited blood alcohol concentrationshould be lowered from .04%. In a final rule amendment published elsewhere in today's <T4>Federal Register</T4>, FRA extends from October 2, 1989, to January16, 1990, the date by which railroads must comply with subpart H of part219 (and 49 CFR part 40) with respect to reasonable cause and pre-employmentdrug testing (subparts D and F of part 219). The effective date of 49 CFR219.102 (the ``drug-free rule'') and the date by which Class I freightrailroads, Amtrak and commuter railroads must submit random drug testingprograms will remain October 2, 1989. Other compliance dates are also unchanged.<T3>See </T3>54 FR 22283 (May 23, 1989) (prior revision of compliance schedule).The Secretary of Transportation is also issuing a separate Advance Noticeof Proposed Rulemaking on alcohol abuse prevention that addresses a broadrange of issues involving alcohol countermeasures in all forms of commercialtransportation. <ITAG tagnum="84">Section-by-Section Analysis </ITAG>Part 219 <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart A_General </ITAG><T3>Section 219.3(a) </T3>would be revised to update a cross-referenceto section 202(e) of the Federal Railroad Safety Act of 1970. Paragraph (b) would be amended to conform the previous small railroad exclusionfor reasonable cause and pre-employment testing and the voluntary referral/co-workerreport provisions to the same standards provided in the random testingrule_i.e., the railroad would both have to employ 15 or fewer Hours ofService employees and not operate on tracks of another railroad exceptas necessary for interchange. FRA intends the interchange exclusion toapply to railroads that interchange cars on tracks in close proximity toone another. Where a small railroad operates over trackage of a coveredrailroad for several miles and thus takes on the characteristics of thecovered carrier, that small railroad would be covered by the entire FRAregulation. FRA recognizes that it is not plausible to include railroads in the randomtesting program (by virtue of the fact that they engage in joint operationswith other railroads) unless they fully participate in the remainder ofthe program. The former random testing exclusion (now andSection; 219.609)would then be collapsed into the general-purpose applicability section.<T3>Section 219.5 </T3>(definitions) would be revised by deleting the paragraphnumbers and by adding certain definitions for clarity. The terms ``Class I, ``Class II'' and ``Class III'' (used to modify ``railroad'')would be defined to have the meaning assigned by the Interstate CommerceCommission (when applied to ``rail carrier''). These terms are well knownin the railroad industry and are used with respect to required compliancedates with the random testing program. The definition of impact accident is amended to reemphasize that the damagethreshold for a train accident must be met for the event to come withinthe definition. Following issuance of the original rule in 1985, it becameclear that many railroad officers did not understand the ``train accident''and ``train incident'' concepts embodied in FRA's accident/incident reportingsystem (see 49 CFR part 225). Although extensive educational efforts havegenerally alleviated this problem, FRA wishes to avoid any confusion inthe future. FRA will therefore add clarifying references at a number ofpoints within the regulatory text. The definition of ``impact accident''is further clarified by noting that raking collisions are not within itsscope. Although certain raking collisions may involve crew member responsibility,the original rule was not intended to reach these events, since they involvea wide variety of scenarios where human factors may not be at issue orwhere identifying the individuals associated with the circumstances ofthe accident may be difficult. ``Independent'' would be further defined as not under common control withthe railroad. This term is used in relation to medical facilities usedfor reasonable cause and post-accident tests. In these circumstances, thepositions of the railroad and individual employees may be clearly adverseto one another; and ensuring that collections of samples are handled bydisinterested parties may be important to ensuring employee respect forthe fairness of the program. FRA notes, however, that this proposed changemay involve a hardship in certain cases where a railroad is owned and controlled(as a financial matter) by a principal shipper, whose medical clinic isthe most convenient site for collection. FRA solicits comment on this issue.``Medical Review Officer'' would be added as a defined term. The definitionis the same contained in 49 CFR 40.2. ``Railroad'' would be given the same meaning assigned by section 202(e)of the Federal Railroad Safety Act of 1970, as amended by the Rail SafetyImprovement Act of 1988. This definition is inclusive of all operationsof common carriers engaged in interstate commerce, passenger and freight,regardless of the physical characteristics of the operations, and may includenon-carriers, as well. However, <T3>see </T3>andSection; 219.3 (application). As used in current program operations, the term ``railroad property damage''has the same meaning assigned under 49 CFR part 225, FRA's accident/incidentreporting regulations. FRA will add a definition to part 219 to avoid anyconfusion over this concept. Railroad property damage refers to damageto railroad property, including railroad on-track equipment, signals, track,track structures (including bridges and tunnels), or roadbed, includinglabor costs and all other costs for repair or replacement in kind. Estimatedcost for replacement of railroad propety is to be calculated as describedin the FRA Guide for Preparing Accident/Incident Reports. FRA does notspecify a detailed method for calculating passenger equipment damage inthe current Guide, nor (in contrast to freight equipment) is there a recognizedcommercial standard that could be applied to value passenger equipmentin this context. FRA therefore proposes to require that passenger equipmentdamage be calculated based on replacement value. <T3>Section 219.9 </T3>would be amended to simplify the section and conformit to FRA's comprehensive approach to civil penalty assessments as setforth in 49 CFR part 209 (53 FR 52918, Dec. 29, 1988). FRA believes thatthe structure of the individual rule provisions will adequately protectagainst liability arising inappropriately. Further, FRA notes that therailroads have now had an extended period to become accustomed to the alcohol/drugregulations and to devise systems that will ensure compliance.FRA proposes to retain two specific qualifications on the duty of compliancewhich are unique to the alcohol/drug area. These provisions provide thata railroad would be in violation of prohibitions on alcohol or drug use,possession or impairment by one of its employees only where the railroadhad (i) willfully required or permitted the employee to go or remain onduty in covered service while the employee was in violation or (ii) failedto exercise due diligence (a high degree of care) to assure compliance.FRA has retained these limitations on railroad liability by adding a newandSection; 219.105 to subpart B and by cross-referencing that new sectionin andSection; 219.9. Paragraph (b) would be added to address the issue of joint operations.When railroads operate in common facilities or on the property of anotherrailroad, individual responsibilities (as among the railroads) are normallydetermined by joint operating agreements, trackage rights agreements, andother private contracts. (FRA may focus its compliance efforts on the trackowner with respect to track safety matters and the operating entity withrespect to certain other matters.) FRA has been queried concerning applicationof the alcohol/drug rule in joint operations with sufficient frequencyto indicate the need for a clarifying amendment. The proposed amendmentwould make the host railroad primarily responsible for compliance withtesting under subparts C and D, which involve occurrences under circumstanceswhere supervisors of the foreign line employees may be unavailable. Theemploying railroad has a secondary responsibility in these in joint operatingcontexts and would retain the primary responsibility with respect to otheraspects of the rules, including the alcohol/drug use prohibitions and randomtesting. Railroads could still agree among themselves with respect to whichentity would be expected to take the initiative in defined circumstances.Obviously, it will be important for employees to know to whom they mustbe responsive in circumstances where testing may be required or authorized.<T3>Section 219.11</T3> would be amended through several technical andclarifying changes. Paragraph (a) would be amended to conform the impliedconsent provisions of the rule by recognizing the new random testing subpart.Paragraph (b) would be amended to state expressly the policy of the agencythat necessary medical treatment shall be accorded priority over breathor body fluid testing where the employee has sustained a personal injury.The amendment would also make clear that extraordinary medical intervention(catheterization) is not authorized where the employee is unable to providea urine sample as a result of an injury or related treatment. A new paragraph(b)(3) would provide the failure to remain available following an accidentor casualty as required by company rules shall be considered a refusalto participate in testing (under the part). Finally, a new paragraph (b)(4)would state expressly that tampering with a sample to prevent a valid testconstitutes a refusal.Paragraph (d) would be amended to extend the express consent requirementnow in place for post-accident testing to include reasonable cause andrandom testing. The purpose of the provision is to make clear that an employeeshall evidence written consent to testing whenever such testing is legitimatelyrequired under this part. The consent would be provided to the entity collectingthe specimen, if required by that entity. Since collectors are not in privitywith the employer and must rely on employer representations, some collectorsmay require such expressions before going forward. However, FRA has notedthat some medical facilities use forms of consent that may contain extraneousmaterial. The amendment would appropriately limit the effect of the consentto that required by the section, and any clause waiving rights the employeewould otherwise enjoy against the employer would be void. Employees couldnot be required to waive any recourse that they may have as a result ofan improper collection.Paragraph (g) would be added to make clear that, on the one hand, the ruledoes not restrict the railroad from conducting other testing (that therailroad may otherwise be free to do) and, on the other, that samples takenunder this part may not be used for testing other than that authorizedor mandated under the rule. The rule further states that all urine froma void constitutes a single sample. These limitations are necessary toavoid the implication of Federal action with respect to tests that go beyondthe scope of those authorized or required by the rule. The new provisionwould be an expanded version of the language presently at andSection; 219.305(which would be deleted).<T3>Section 219.19 </T3>(Field Manual) would be amended to conform to otherchanges, particularly the inclusion of post-accident testing proceduresin appendix C. FRA intends to develop a Second Edition of the Field Manualreflecting the addition of the random testing program, the DOT Procedures,and the decisions made in this proceeding.At the time of the final rule, andSection; 219.21 will be amended to reflectthe current placement of paperwork burdens.<T3>Section 219.23</T3> would add a requirement that employees be givenclear written notice when tests are conducted under the FRA rule and thebasis upon which the test was required. This information should generallybe included on the urine collection form.This proposal is responsive to two separate concerns. First, a number ofrailroads have commenced for-cause and other testing programs under theirown management authority or under collectively bargained agreements. Theseprograms may be broader or narrower than the FRA testing programs, bothwith respect to the type of employee covered and the bases on which testingmay be required. In certain cases, these programs are clearly distinctfrom the FRA testing programs; in others, sufficient overlap exists topresent the possibility for confusion. In either case, employees have theright to know who is requiring their participation in testing. Althoughas a safety regulatory agency, FRA has no direct interest in the regulationof tests conducted wholly under management programs, FRA has repeatedlybeen asked to become involved in the investigation of individual testingincidents. In some of these cases, employees were apparently led to believethat tests were being required under the FRA rule.Similarly, even where it is clear that FRA's authority is being reliedupon for testing a covered employee, employees may not be told immediatelythe basis of the test (reasonable suspicion, violation of an enumeratedoperating rule, etc.). Although it may not be realistic to require supervisorsto write detailed reports of the circumstances underlying a test priorto sample collection, the employee should be told with reasonable specificitywhy it is they are being tested (as it expressly required for random testingunder andSection; 219.601(b)(7)). The proposal would not require written notices for individual non-FRA testingevents. Use of approved forms would be sufficient to provide notice thatemployees are being tested under subpart C (mandatory post-accident testing).The rule would prohibit use of those forms for other purposes.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart B_Prohibitions</ITAG><T3>Section 219.101</T3> (prohibitions). FRA solicits comment on whetherthe current <T3>per se </T3>prohibited blood alcohol concentration (BAC) should bereduced from .04 to .00 percent. FRA notes the suggestions of the NationalTransportation Board that this be done and the action by the Federal HighwayAdministration under the Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986 thatmotor vehicle drivers with BACs in the range above .00 percent, but below.04 percent, be removed from service for a 24-hour period (53 FR 39044,Oct. 4, 1988). The railroad industry has long maintained (though has notsuccessfully enforced) a rule that an employee may not report for workwith any alcohol in the employee's system.Prior to issuance of the current .04% <T3>per se</T3> prohibition in 1985, FRA received extensive testimony onthe subject of alcohol use in railroad operations. FRA noted at that timethat prohibitions established at lower levels are more difficult to enforce.As the NTSB and other commenters have recognized, most chemical tests foralcohol are reliable down to only about .02 percent (though well-controlledgas chromatographic analyses provide sensitivity to .01 percent with goodconfidence). Cases where employees are caught drinking or in possessionof alcohol on the job are punishable without regard to BAC. There are thereforfew cases where a .00 percent rule would be enforceable but where otherprohibitions would not also apply. Those cases would principally involveBACs in the range of .02-.04 percent, and would be subject to severe problemswith respect to timeliness of chemical testing (since BAC would fall belowreliably documentable levels from within a matter of minutes to one ortwo hours). Issues of fairness might also arise where employees who hadconsumed alcohol some hours before were subject to short calls and forcedto report to work without knowing whether every remaining trace of alcoholhad been eliminated from their blood. Clearly, then, the question before FRA is whether the exemplary or preventivevalue of a no-alcohol standard would be of sufficient use in reducing consumptionof alcoholic beverage, during the period employees are subject to call,to offset the technical and practical problem involved in dealing withlow blood alcohol levels. In light of the Federal Highway Administrationaction, and the expert study on which it was based, FRA believes that thisissue warrants review and reserves the option to lower the prohibited levelcontained in andSection; 219.101 in the final rule document, either to .00percent or another level. <T3>See</T3> Transportation Research Board, <T3>Zero Alcohol and Other Options</T3> (National Research Council SpecialReport No. 216, Washington, DC, 1987). <T3>Section 219.103</T3> (Prescribed and over-the-counter drugs) wouldbe amended to explicitly address the situation in which the employee isbeing treated by more than one medical practitioner and therefore is atrisk with respect to drug interactions. One of the prescribing physiciansor dentists would be required to evaluate the effect of all medicationsin combination. <T3>Section 219.104</T3> would be added to address the general issue ofresponsive action in the event an employee tests positive in a requiredor authorized test. The approach embodied in the drafting combines theprovisions of the random drug testing rule governing suspension and conditionsfor return to service (current andSection; 219.605) with post-suspensionhearing procedures similar to those for refusals of post-accident testing(andSection; 219.213(b)). With the advent of the drug-use prohibition of andSection; 219.104 and thedecision in the context of the random drug testing rulemaking to establisha safety floor with respect to responsive action when an employee testspositive, it is clear that the entire rule should be reviewed for consistencyand sound design. Options available to FRA include repealing the existingprovision relating to responsive action, limiting procedural guidance tocases where FRA authorized or mandated tests are reported as positive indicatingviolation of Subpart B of the current rule, and including requirementsfor any situation where violation of Subpart B may be established (includingrailroad tests, evidence from observations by supervisors, and other sources).FRA believes that Federalizing the entire disciplinary process relatedto substance abuse on the railroads would not be wise and is not necessary.However, where mandated or authorized tests are conducted and alcohol ordrug presence is verified indicating violation of the FRA rule, FRA believesthat minimal standards should be set out to protect employees while establishinga safety floor with respect to handling of the violator. The proposed rule would provide that if, as a result of a test under theFRA rule, it is believed that the employee violated andSection; 219.101 orandSection; 219.102, the employee would then be entitled to a prompt hearingbefore a person other than the charging officer. If the railroad determinesthat the FRA rule was violated, the employee could not be returned to serviceuntil the employee had been evaluated by a substance abuse professional(``EAP counselor''), had participated in any primary treatment deemed necessary,and had tested negative on return-to-work alcohol and drug tests. Thereafter,the employee would be subject to aftercare and a reasonable program offollow-up testing. The procedures are intended to work in tandem with existingdiciplinary systems in the railroad industry, as is the case with respectto refusals of post-accident testing under existing rules that have withstoodjudicial scrutiny. It should be noted that the proposed rule would require suspension onlywhen the Medical Review Officer has reported the test result as positive,following opportunity for a medical interview. Even then, if the railroadlater determined that there was a defect in the test procedure or thatthe test result was attributable to innocent ingestion (a remote possibility,however unlikely), then the employee would have available the normal remedies,such as reinstatement with back pay. The return-to-service provisions are not intended to require reinstatementof employees who violate alcohol/drug prohibitions. In the case of first-timeviolators many railroads assess stern sanctions, up to and including dismissal.Such sanctions create a salutary deterrent effect. Other railroads participatein Operation Red Block, under which first-time violators may be protectedfrom disciplinary sanctions if they are willing to accept treatment. Inexchange for this leniency, employees join together in prevention committeesand participate directly in enforcement of workplace fitness requirements.Still other railroads deal with first-time violators through the railroad'smedical qualifications program. In the case of employees who have violatedalcohol/drug prohibitions more than once, virtually all railroads imposea sanction of dismissal. However, company policies continue to encourageself-referral of employees who may have received treatment in the pastand who are experiencing a recurrence of uncontrolled abuse. The proposedrule amendment would be compatible with each of these approaches, so longas the minimum requirements are met. FRA believes these requirements arenecessary to undergird company substance abuse programs, avoid conflictwith the variety of state laws addressing occupational drug testing, andensure that the testing requirements are effective. FRA has not included in the regulatory text, but notices for comment, arequirement that any employee who is determined to have violated the rule'sprohibitions for a second time during a five-year period would be deemeddisqualified for an established period thereafter. A similar issue is beingraised in connection with FRA's rulemaking on locomotive operator certificationpursuant to the Rail Safety Improvement Act of 1988. Paragraph (d) would add provisions more fully describing the scope of follow-uptesting. Although FRA has not sought to be highly prescriptive with respectto the frequency and duration of follow-up testing, leaving these issuesto the judgment of the companies and their medical officers or EAP counselors,FRA does believe that such testing (of whatever duration) should includeboth alcohol and controlled substances). It is extremely common for thosewith substance abuse problems to engage in ``polyabuse''_i.e., the abuseof more than one compound. Alcohol is by far the most common alternativedrug among those with marijuana, cocaine, or other drug abuse problems.The testing requirement is designed to address alcohol on the basis ofuse that would offend the rule, since not all those who violate andSection;219.101 or 219.102 will be chemically dependent, and such dependency mayprovide the only basis on which a therapy of total abstinence can be required(though it may be identified as a treatment goal for others). Accordingly,the form of testing would be breath testing or urine alcohol testing usingthe two-sample procedure. The theory underlying urine testing for alcoholis more full described in connection with amendments to the reasonablecause testing provisions.<T3>Section 219.105 </T3>would be added to describe the limitations onrailroad liability with respect to the prevention of violations of thesubpart B prohibitions. These limitations are currently found in andSection;219.9. In summary, the provisions require the railroad to exercise a highdegree of care to prevent violations, but do not impose liability where,despite such efforts, an individual employee uses alcohol or drugs in amanner that is prohibited (and the railroad is not aware of the conduct).<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart C_Post-Accident Toxicological Testing</ITAG>FRA believes that the post-accident testing requirements have, in general,served their intended purposes well and do not require major overhaul inlight of program experience. However, FRA proposes a variety of clarifying,perfecting and conforming amendments in light of experience under the ruleand other related rulemaking.Throughout the proposed amendments, FRA includes parenthetical explanationsof the concepts underlying the testing criteria (``train accident,'' ``trainincident'').<T3>Section 219.201. </T3>FRA proposes to clarify andSection; 219.201(a)(1)(ii).Release of hazardous material in a train accident accompanied by an evacuationor injury from product would be a qualifying event for testing only wherethe hazardous material release involves railroad freight car lading. AlthoughFRA makes this proposal based on experience involving relatively minorreleases of hazardous materials (e.g., from a propane tank along the rightof away), FRA solicits comment on whether a different rule should apply.FRA also solicits comment on whether the hazardous materials testing criteriashould be refined or modified to more closely resemble the revised criteriafor immediate reporting of certain hazardous materials incidents to theResearch and Special Programs Administration (<T3>See </T3>54 FR 25808, 25812; June 19, 1989).FRA proposes to add to the listing of major train accidents at paragraph(a)(1)(iv) any train accident involving a passenger train that resultsin one or more reportable injures. Although most significant passengertrain accidents have been covered under other testing criteria, FRA agreeswith the National Transportation Safety Board and others who have recommendedthat a separate criterion be stated in the regulations to avoid a typicalsituations where passenger safety has been seriously imperiled, yet testingwould not otherwise occur. FRA estimates that no more than ten (10) additionalaccidents per year would require testing under this criterion. It shouldbe noted again that the proposal will require testing only after a ``trainaccident'' as defined by the rule. That is, there must have been an eventinvolving derailment or collision producing damage that reaches the reportingthreshold (currently $5,700). An accident involving a trip or fall by apassenger or rough train handling resulting in minor injury would not,by itself, require testing under subpart C.Paragraph (b) of the current rule excepts rail-highway grade crossing accidentsfrom testing. The proposed amendment to that section would also exceptany case of an accident/incident the cause and severity of which are whollyattributable to a natural cause (e.g., flood, tornado or other naturaldisaster), as determined on the basis of objective and documented factsby the railroad representative responding to the scene. In the past threeyears, FRA is aware of two documented tornado-caused accidents where testingwas required. FRA agrees that testing should be excused in those situations.However, FRA remains concerned that an exception could be abused or couldlead to loss of important data where it is initially believed that thesubject employees had no opportunity to respond to the natural cause, butit is later determined that they could have avoided or reduced the severityof the accident by taking proper responsive action. This notice proposesthe ``Act of God'' exception but also requests comment on how abuse ofthis provision can best be prevented.Paragraph (c)(1) would be amended to disqualify from making the testingdeterminations any railroad representative who is immediately involvedin the circumstances of the accident/incident. This could include a railroadofficer riding the train in a supervisory capacity or directing the routingof trains at a dispatching center.The amendment would also clarify the issue of joint decision making withrespect to whether an accident qualifies for testing. In order to ensurecompliance with Subpart C and avoid testing where it is not required, somerailroads have required that the responding railroad representative contacthigher authority to discuss the testing decision. This practice has theadvantage of more uniform decision making, but can also contribute to delaysin testing and confusion over responsibility for the decision. The amendmentwould reiterate that the responding representative must make the requiredfactual determinations and would require that any other person making afinal decision based on facts reported by the on-scene representative certifythe basis of the decision in writing within 24 hours. The proposal is notintended to prevent collaboration between the on-scene official and a highauthority (or person with specialized expertise) on issues such as therailroad damage estimate for individual units of damaged equipment. However,the on-scene representative must describe the visible damage in suitabledetail to derive an estimate. A host freight railroad may rely upon replacementdamage estimates and repair estimates provided by a passenger railroad,subject to the same requirement that visible damage be described.Paragraph (c)(2) would be amended to emphasize that the ``good faith''language with respect to determination of qualifying events for testingdoes not excuse errors of law. The railroad and its supervisors are responsiblefor being aware of the requirements of Subpart C so that testing can beconducted readily and according to the prescribed criteria. Although agood faith error in estimating property damage would be understandable,it would not be excusable for the railroad to apply a property damage criterionother than those specified in subpart C.A new subparagraph (4) with paragraph (c) would clarify that if an accidentis deemed to be a qualifying event based on reasonable inquiry and goodfaith judgment (together with application of the mandatory criteria), thenit is a qualifying event for all purposes, including reporting of testresults, even if at a later date the factual predicates are found not tomatch precisely the testing criteria. For instance, if field estimatesshould place damage at $550,000, but later more detailed estimates reducethe amount to $480,000, that would not vitiate the basis of the test. Onthe other hand, if the railroad fails to make reasonable inquiry into thefacts, exercises bad faith in determining the facts, or applies inappropriatestandards, and it is later determined that the accident did not qualifyfor testing, then any samples received would be destroyed and results ofany analysis would not be reported. <T3>Section 219.203(a) </T3>deals with the responsibilities of the railroadand employees tested. Paragraph (a)(1) would be amended expressly to require employee cooperationin testing. Non-cooperation would include deliberate avoidance of testingby going absent without leave, refusal to provide specimens, and failureto participate in documentation of the collection process. Paragraph (a)(3) would be amended for purposes of emphasis. As originallyissued, the rule was structured to require testing of all train crew membersand other covered employees involved in the circumstances of ``major trainaccidents'' described in andSection;219.201(a)(1), but it provided for exclusionof individual train crew members involved in ``impact accidents'' and ``fataltrain incidents'' under andSection;219.201(a) (2) and (3) where the railroadrepresentative could immediately determine (i.e., without incurring furtherdelays in testing) that the particular employee had no role in the cause(s)of the accident. FRA is concerned that in some situations railroads mayhave hesitated to utilize this provision. Accordingly, FRA proposes tochange the words ``employee is excluded'' to read ``employee shall be excluded.''Although FRA recognizes that the causes of an impact accident or fataltrain incident (fatality to on-duty employee) may not be immediately clearand that, as a result, the rule creates a presumption of testing wheresignificant doubt exists, FRA believes that using mandatory language withrespect to the exclusion may provide reassurance to railroad representativesthat, where they can exclude responsibility on the part of one or moreemployees based on information that becomes immediately available in thecourse of determining whether the event qualifies for testing, then thepolicy of the rule clearly directs that they not be tested. The amendmentalso notes that employee contribution to the severity of the accident shouldbe considered in making this determination (as it is in determining whetheran employee may be tested under subpart D), since in many cases promptcrewmember response or appropriate dispatcher oversight may significantlymitigate the severity of an accident. Paragraph (b) of andSection;219.203 would be amended by adding a new subparagraph(4) that addresses issues raised during implementation with respect toprompt testing of employees while they remain in duty status. Railroadrules typically require employees to remain on site following an accidentor casualty, unless it is necessary to perform other duties. The currentpost-accident testing rules are built on the assumption that this willoccur and that the railroad will promptly direct employees to accompanya supervisor to an independent medical facility for testing. Although thisis typically the case in practice, there have been exceptions. In somecases, employees have been allowed to leave duty status following qualifyingevents and have later been recalled for testing. In one well publicizedcase, an employee left his post and was not available for testing for overthree days. FRA believes there will seldom be a situation where a railroad is justifiedin releasing an employee prior to testing. The proposed amendment makesclear, therefore, that the railroad shall retain covered employees who``may be subject to testing'' in duty status for the period necessary tomake the on-site determinations and, as appropriate, complete the samplecollection procedure. Where, through inadvertence or circumstances notnow foreseen, the railroad releases the employee and later determines thattesting should have occurred, FRA proposes to make clear that the employeewill not be recalled. An employee who is free to go home without restrictionis also free to utilize alcoholic beverages. Although use of controlledsubstances is permitted only consistent with medical authorization, itis nevertheless true that actual or claimed intervening use of drugs createsmajor complications in interpreting the significance of testing data. FRAtherefore believes that considerations of employee privacy (with respectto legitimate off-duty use of alcohol), fairness and effectiveness arguefor terminating the testing procedure where the employee has been releasedfrom duty. However, where an injured employee is transported for the purpose of medicalcare directly to the medical facility, intervening alcohol use is not anissue. Further, any administration of drugs at the medical facility canbe readily verified, both as to time and dosage. As is the case today,railroads would continue to have an obligation to pursue testing in thesecircumstances, unless provision of the sample or samples might be inconsistentwith the employee's health. In the extraordinary case where the employee is absent without leave followingan accident but later reappears, testing could still be conducted. However,the refusal implicit is becoming absent without permission would not beexcused. Paragraph (c) would be amended to explicitly require the railroad to pre-designatepost-accident collection sites. It is necessary for the railroad to surveyavailable hospitals, clinics and other medical facilities to determinewhich facilities are willing to assist in post-accident testing, to ensurethat services will be available promptly, and to emphasize the importanceof careful, controlled collections in conformity with this part. Most majorrailroads have undertaken this task. However, in some limited situations,employees have been transported to facilities that would not assist inthe collection process. In other cases, hospital emergency rooms have beenused only because other available facilities had not been surveyed. Hospitalemergency rooms appropriately give priority to trauma cases, and collectionsmay be delayed as a result. FRA proposes to amend the rule to ensure thatany remaining railroads follow through appropriately. <T3>Section 219.205 </T3>would be amended to reference the new appendixC (post-accident sample collection) in lieu of the Field Manual. Paragraph (d) would be amended to clarify its intent that toxicology kitsbe shipped as soon as possible (normally within a matter of minutes ora very few hours). The means of transportation should be adequate to ensuredelivery within 24 hours of shipment. The section is further clarifiedto emphasize that, whenever reasonably possible, transfer of the sealedkit should be directly from the collecting medical facility to the courier,so that no issue arises with respect to the railroad's access to the specimens.FRA recognizes that this will not always be practical, given the remotelocations at which some collections must occur. If, therefore, the railroadrepresentative must transport the sealed kit to a point of shipment, itis the responsibility of the railroad to document secure chain of custodyof the kit during that interval. This could be done through a separatechain of custody document or other writing documenting continuity of custodyand attested by all persons who may have handled the box. <T3>Section 219.207(d) </T3>would be amended to update a cross-reference(to Appendix C in place of the Field Manual). <T3>Section 219.209(a)(1) </T3>would be amended to update the telephonenumber to which notification of post-accident testing events will be provided.<T3>Section 219.211 </T3>would be amended to address the issues of medicalreview of post-accident testing results. Existing paragraphs would be redesignatedto accommodate revision of the section. In order to understand the manner in which these provisions will function,it is necessary to describe FRA's administrative procedures for post-accidenttesting. At the time of sample collection, employees are provided the opportunityto provide information concerning medical use or administration of drugs.This information is reviewed on FRA's behalf by qualified personnel, includinga medical doctor having qualifications to serve as a Medical Review Officer,prior to the reporting of any analytically positive result. Because a principalfunction of the FRA post-accident testing program is to determine accidentcausation and to explore the role of impairing substances in railroad safety,all confirmed, analytically significant results are reported to the railroadand the employee, and are available for accident investigation purposes,whether or not they indicate prohibited use. This is done because it ispossible for even legitimate medical use of a drug to cause side effectsthat may lead to an accident. An important long-term function of the post-accidenttesting program may be to identify whether medical practice in this areais sufficiently sensitive to the potential adverse safety consequencesof therapeutic drug use and to determine whether such use is being properlysupervised. However, where the employee has declared medical use of a controlled substance,FRA does endeavor to affirm in the laboratory report whether the findingsare consistent with declared medical use. In exceptional cases, this mayrequire contacting the employee directly to ascertain more informationconcerning claimed dosage or time of ingestion. However, FRA may not attemptat this stage to verify the existence of a proper prescription. Instead,FRA believes it is more appropriate for the railroad Medical Review Officer,who is often also the medical officer of the railroad, to make appropriateinquiries and to disclose to FRA only such information as is necessaryfor FRA's purposes (which normally would not include data describing theunderlying condition for which the drug was prescribed). Accordingly, paragraph (b) would provide that test results are reportedto the employee and the railroad's Medicial Review Officer. The railroadwould have the same duty of confidentiality with respect to the resultsas provided for tests subject to subpart G of the regulations, except tothe extent the FRA or the NTSB has publicly disclosed the results as necessaryfor the conduct of an accident investigation. Under paragraph (c), test results for surviving employees would be reviewedby the railroad's MRO in the same manner required for other tests subjectto the regulations. Although the principal purpose of the review wouldbe to reconcile test results with claimed medical use of drugs, FRA's designatedlaboratory will cooperate with the Medical Review Officer with respectto other steps the MRO may wish to take to review the test results. Theresults of the review would be reported to FRA for use in FRA's accidentinvestigation, enforcement and data collection processes. It should be noted that FRA maintains an independent oversight and technicalreview capability for its designated laboratory which can provide expertadvice to FRA with respect to any contested test result. There may be occasionswhere the interests of the railroad employing the Medical Review Officerand that of investigating public agencies are inconsistent. Accordingly,neither FRA nor NTSB would be bound by the results of the railroad MROreview, although it would be binding with respect to disciplinary purposesinternal to the railroad; and FRA would consider the results of the reviewin exercising its responsibilities. Paragraph (d) describes FRA's practice of maintaining medical informationin confidence to the extent permitted by law, except where necessary todischarge its statutory responsibilities. FRA believes that it is obligatedby law to provide information pertinent to an accident investigation tothe National Transportation Safety Board. FRA urges the Board to maintainmedical information in confidence except as necessary for the proper conductof its investigations. Paragraph (e) (currently (a)(2)) would clarify the manner in which an employeecould contribute to the accident/incident investigation by responding tothe toxicology report. Redesignated paragraph (h) (currently (d)) would be amended to lengthenthe retention period for positive samples from six months to two years,which is the actual current practice. The retention period for negativresamples would be reduced from six months to three months. Retention ofnegative specimens is appropriate in this context because of the significanceof certain of the events subject to testing; however, the current retentionperiod for negatives is believed to be unreasonably long. A new paragraph (i) would make explicit the agency's current practice ofallowing reanalysis of specimens by the designated laboratory or by anothercertified laboratory with an appropriate, validated assay, at the employee'srequest. The request would have to be made within 60 days of the date ofthe toxicology report, in order to encourage early problem resolution andto minimize technical issues related to extended storage and later reanalysisof specimens. It would be within FRA's discretion whether to allow reanalysisafter that period. Although FRA can provide for reanalysis at its designated laboratory atthe employee's request, any employee-requested reanalysis conducted atanother laboratory would be at the expense of the employee. However, thiswould not bar FRA from procuring additional analysis in a proper case wherenecessary to achieve program purposes. <T3>Section 219.213(a)(1) </T3>(refusals) would be amended to make a technicalcorrection. (Other amendments to section 219.11 provide that the conceptof refusal of a test includes failure to remain available as required bycompany rules or tampering with a specimen to defeat the test.) The new paragraph (a)(4) would provide that, upon the expiration of the9-month disqualification period, an employee could return to work onlyunder the same conditions provided for violations of the alcohol/drug prohibitionsin andSection; 219.104. It should be noted that the required EAP evaluationand any necessary treatment could occur within the 9-month period. <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart D_Reasonable Cause Testing</ITAG>As structured in the final rule issued in 1985, reasonable cause testingwas designed to detect and deter on-the-job alcohol or drug use or impairment.Employers were permitted to act on information derived from this testingwith respect to non-medical drug use that was not established to have shownuse or impairment on the job, but were not required to do so. With adoptionof andSection; 219.102, the Federal drug-free rule, the focus of this testingprocedure will now be expanded to include prohibited use of controlledsubstances at any time, as evidenced by drugs or their metabolites remainingin the body at the time of an in-service reasonable cause urine test. Overtime, this innovation may warrant adjustment of the bases for testing,as well as the other changes proposed in this notice. However, due to theshort period available to complete the instant rulemaking, the additionalissues presented with respect to further program development will be deferred.FRA notes that the major issue facing the agency with respect to the reasonablecause program is whether to retain that aspect of its character which isdesigned to address drug impairment. The rule currently creates a presumptionof impairment from a positive urine test, unless the employee exercisesthe available option of a blood test. If the employee provides a bloodsample, then the urine and blood test results are reviewed together; andthe best available scientific information is used in concert with evidenceconcerning the employee's behavior to ascertain whether, on a preponderanceof the evidence basis, the employee is impaired. Even if the employee isnot determined to have been impaired, however, the railroad may still proceedbased on a positive urine test alone to assess any discipline that maybe appropriate under its established policies published to employees througha required notice.As further background, it should be emphasized that the purpose of theblood test is not to ``confirm'' the urine test results. Urine analysisincludes both screening and confirmatory analysis by gas chromatography/massspectrometry for the parent drug or for metabolites of the prohibited parentdrug. It would not be unusual for a urine test to be positive and the bloodtest for the same drug negative, depending on the relative recency of useand the sensitivity of the blood test. This is true because drugs are generallyfound in the blood in lower concentrations than the urine during the latterphase of the elimination cycle. Residual blood levels of the drug or itsmetabolities may then be so low as to escape detection by available tests.FRA recognizes the limitations of the current approach in light of theaddition of the drug-free rule. If a railroad maintains a policy of handlingall positive drug tests in the same manner regardless of the likelihoodthat the employee was impaired by the acute effects of the drug on thejob (e.g., through medical disqualification), then it can be argued thatthe blood test option and the presumption of impairment are superfluous.At the same time, if at any later date the railroad or an arbitrator maybe tempted to infer from a positive urine test and unsafe conduct thatthe employee was impaired on the job, then it may be useful to the employeeto have the right of a blood test at the time of urine sample collectionin order to provide exculpatory information.FRA is also aware that appropriately sensitive blood analyses for drugsare available from a limited number of laboratories; and the interpretationof the results of these tests require specialized knowledge beyond thatrequired for normal medical review purposes.Accordingly, FRA requests comment on elimination of the urine impairmentpresumption and the boood test option. However, the structure of the proposedrule changes assumes retention of both. FRA believes that tests conductedin the railroad industry on reasonable suspicion or after unsafe practicesmay present special considerations that warrant providing employees withthe opportunity to provide full information concerning their fitness. Theexisting program appears to have worked reasonably well in practice, thoughsome railroads may have been discouraged from utilizing the FRA authoritybecause of the complexities that these features introduce. Further, FRAhas just completed extended litigation challenging the reasonable causeand post-accident testing programs. Both programs were upheld in theirentirety. Major changes to either program may be seen to invite furtherlitigation, and by their nature these issues are sufficiently complex andtechnical to invite extended judicial consideration of any challenges.FRA believes that the interests of safety may be better served by reservingsignificant changes for further consideration at a later date. Accordingly,the proposed changes would not disturb the basic program design but makeonly those changes necessary to conform the rule to advances in testingsafeguards and reflect experience in program administration.FRA further solicits comment on the possibility of excusing the requirementthat employees have a blood test option where the urine result is usedfor limited purposes, such as temporary medical disqualification in thecase of an initial positive. Where the railroad does not attempt to makea determination concerning on-duty use or impairment (i.e., where the railroadtreats all cases as if the blood test was exculpatory as to on-duty acuteeffects), less reason would appear to require the additional expense andcomplication associated with the optional blood test.<T3>Section 219.301 </T3>of the existing rule sets out the circumstancesunder which testing may be required. Instructing railroad supervisors tounderstand these conditions for testing is a significant undertaking thatthe railroads have addressed through structured training programs. Theproposed amendments are, again, minor and of a clarifying or conformingnature.Paragraph (a) would be amended to reflect the fact that reasonable causeurine tests would now detect non-compliance with andSection; 219.102, aswell as andSection; 219.101, and to reference the new andSection; 219.23, whichrequires notice to employees concerning the authority under which the testwas conducted as the general basis of the test (e.g., suspicion of currentimpairment, violation of an enumerated operating rule).Paragraph (b)(3), which enumerates those rule violations that provide abasis for a reasonable cause breath or urine test, would be amended bymaking a typographical correction and by adding explicit reference to twounsafe practices that have been construed as coming within the purviewof the existing provisions. Both entering a cross-over before both switcheshave been properly lined for movement and running through a switch (otherthan a switch designed to activate automatically with the movement's approach)involve operating on a segment of track in an unauthorized manner. Theproposed amendments would clarify that these particular unsafe practicesprovide a basis for testing. The proposed amendments would also clarifythat failure to flag a train that is fouling an adjacent track, where requiredby the railroad's rules, is likewise a basis for testing.Paragraph (f) would be amended to provide that reasonable cause collectionsmay only be conducted promptly following the observations or events uponwhich the testing decision is based, consistent with the need to protectlife and property. FRA has noted an excessive number of instances wherethe railroad has, following a rule violation or reportable accident/incident,allowed the employees involved to complete their normal duties before commencingthe testing process. This practice erodes employee confidence in the programand renders less valuable the right of the employee to provide a bloodtest for analysis. It also raises questions concerning the railroad's commitmentto maintaining a safe work environment and may lead to violations of theHours of Service Act and the 8-hour limitation on testing described below.The intent of the proposed amendment is to require that testing be commencedas soon as practical after the triggering event, since the purpose of testingis to ascertain whether alcohol or drug use may have contributed to theoccurrence.It should be noted that the 8-hour limitation is not based on fixed technicallimitations on breath or urine testing. In the case of alcohol, which iseliminated from the blood at an average rate of about .018% per hour, thedetection window obviously varies in relation to the blood alcohol levelat the time of the event in question (and individual variations in rateof elimination). Drug residues may be eliminated in the urine for periodsafter last use from two to three days to in excess of one week, dependingon the drug, frequency of prior use, and degree of concentration of theurine. Thus, for alcohol, very prompt testing is desirable. For other drugs,urine levels will normally remain detectable well beyond the 8-hour period.However, drug levels in the blood tend to fall more quickly than urinelevels, depending on the drug in question and whether the parent or metabolites,or both, are subject to testing.Paragraph (f)(2) (newly subdivided) would be amended with respect to the8-hour limitation. Unlike post-accident testing, for which the public interestin obtaining available toxicological information regardless of necessarydelays, the reasonable cause testing program sets an absolute 8-hour limitation.FRA solicits comments with respect to all issues involving the 8-hour rule.The proposed changes would clarify and refine the 8-hour rule in lightof program experience. First, the 8-hour period would run from the timeof the event or the time the responsible supervisor receives notice ofthe event, whichever is later. This provision is intended to deal withthe situation such as one in which an employee is injured, but either theemployee conceals the injury to avoid testing or the seriousness of theinjury does not manifest itself until some hours later. In either case,allowing 8 hours (if necessary) within which the supervisor can go to thesite, evaluate the situation, determine who should be tested, transportthe employees to the collection site, and complete the collection proceduremay not be excessive. FRA is concerned, however, that the proposed provisionmay itself be subject to manipulation on the side of the railroad and solicitsany suggestions for further refinement.Paragraph (f)(3) would provide that an employee, once released, may notbe recalled for reasonable cause testing. This would be true even if theemployee reported an on-the-job injury after leaving work. FRA believesthat the railroads have sufficient ability to penalize employees who failto make prompt reports of injuries. Should an injury manifest itself followingthe end of the duty tour, it is more likely to be of a less serious varietyor (as in the case of muscle strain) of the kind that could be incurredwithout employee fault.Paragraph (f)(4) defines ``responsible railroad supervisor'' for purposesof who would receive notice to commence the 8-hour period. The definitionis intended to be sufficiently broad to avoid abuse; but FRA neverthelesssolicits comment on its formulation.<T3>Section 291.303 </T3>of the existing rule addresses safeguards forbreath testing. Since implementation of the rule in 1986, over 1,000 evidentialbreath tests have been conducted under the rule. So far as FRA has beenmade aware, there have been no significant problems with the regulatorystructure. However, FRA is prepared to make any perfecting changes thatmay appear appropriate on the basis of comments submitted.FRA specifically proposes to amend paragraph (c) to specify standards foranalysis of blood samples that may be submitted on an optional basis byany employee who tests positive in replicate evidential breath tests. Theproposed standards reflect common forensic testing standards similar tothose used in many U.S. jurisdictions and those embodied in the FRA post-accidenttesting program. Quality control procedures parallel the essential internalquality control procedures for drug urinalysis contained in the DOT Procedures.Comment is requested with respect to laboratory qualifications and externalquality control (<T3>see </T3>discussion of urine alcohol analysis with respect to andSection;219.307, below).The proposed blood testing safeguards specifically provide that if theblood test is negative for alcohol (at a cutoff of .02%) then the breathtests shall also be deemed to be negative. FRA is well aware that thismay not be a scientifically ``correct'' outcome, in view of the fact thatdelays in sample collection may result in elimination of detectable levelsof alcohol from the blood. However, the purpose of the blood test optionis to qualitatively verify that the breath alcohol device was measuringethyl alcohol and to provide reassurance to all employees that the testprocedure is fair and not subject to manipulation by the employer. Theonly way these objectives can be achieved is to rely, from a qualitativepoint of view, on the blood alcohol analysis.FRA notes that it is common for breath test readings and later blood analysisquantitations to vary. In the most frequently encountered case, the breathanalysis reading may be taken at the peak of the blood alcohol curve (comprisedof an absorption phase and elimination phase) or during the period of decliningBAC. A blood sample taken at a later time may show a BAC lower than thatdisplayed on the breath alcohol device, even though the breath device displayeda conservatively low reading in relation to actual BAC. This is true becausein the intervening period a portion of the alcohol in the blood has beenmetabolized by the liver. The better quantitation is that taken closestto the triggering event, even though a breath device has been used to estimateBAC. Accordingly, if the blood test is positive, the breath test readingshould normally be viewed as authoritative (assuming compliance with periodicverification of calibration, plausible compatibility of two quantitations,etc.).Under the current rule, breath alcohol readings below .02 percent are considerednegative. An indicated BAC of .04 percent or above indicates possible violationof andSection; 219.101; however, only an indicated BAC of .05 percent ormore on a properly calibrated evidential device operated under appropriateenvironmental conditions by a qualified operator would normally be dispositiveon this point, since devices are maintained within plus or minus .01% oftrue value. Note that under proposed andSection; 219.104, an indicated BACof .05 percent or above would require removal of the employee from serviceand impose certain minimum standards for returning the employee to service.A railroad encountering an indicated BAC of .02-.04% would be free to applyits own disciplinary standards. Railroad rules have historically requiredthat an employee not have any alcohol in his or her system while on duty.FRA does not condone use of any alcohol. (See discussion of andSection; 219.101,above.)<T3>Section 219.305 </T3>of the current rule sets out a portion of theprocedures and safeguards for urine alcohol and drug tests. These provisionswere issued at a time when no national laboratory certification programwas available and prior to development of current, enhanced testing safeguards.FRA therefore provided in its final rule of last November that railroadswould be required to comply with the Transportation Workplace Drug TestingProcedures (49 CFR part 40; 53 FR 47002, Nov. 21, 1988) (DOT Procedures),which were based on the HHS Guidelines (Department of Health and HumanServices Guidelines for Federal Workplace Drug Testing Programs (53 FR11970, April 11, 1988). The proposed amendments would repeal portions ofthe existing sections that are covered in greater detail in the new subpartH, which incorporates the DOT Procedures and indicates appropriate linkagesto existing railroad procedures.FRA does propose to retain the requirement of paragraph (d) that reasonablecause urine collections be performed at independent medical facilities,since on-property collections would raise issues of alleged bias in thecontext of events involving some adversity between the employer and employeeand since collection at a medical facility will make exercise of the bloodtest option realistic.However, FRA is keenly aware that requiring collection at independent medicalfacilities will, in some cases, make control of the collection processmore difficult. Further, railroads that are making extensive arrangementsfor random urine collections on the property may find this requirementburdensome. Accordingly, FRA solicits comments on this issue and, as withother issues raised in this notice, reserves the right to make furtherchanges in light of comments received.The existing rule provisions allow for alcohol analysis using urine, butdo not mandate safeguards specific to this analysis. The proposed amendmentwould continue this alcohol testing authority (more fully discussed below)but cross-referenced a revised andSection; 219.307 containing urine alcoholtesting standards.Paragraph (e) would be deleted from this section, since the issue willbe covered in the proposed amendments to andSection; 219.11.<T3>Section 219.307</T3> of the existing rule contains standards for laboratoryurine analysis and reporting. These provisions would be repealed in favorof the more rigorous and detailed provisions of subpart H and the new part40.A revised andSection; 219.307 would address the specific issue of urine alcoholtesting. Urine is ordinarily not a preferred fluid for alcohol analysisbecause urine alcohol levels based on single samples do not reliably correspondto blood alcohol concentrations at the time the urine is collected (norat any clearly definable point in the past). However, there are situationswhere urine alcohol analysis may be indicated. Often observations givingrise to suspicion of alcohol or drug impairment will provide insufficientcues to discern whether the symptoms displayed resulted from use of drugs,alcohol, or alcohol and drugs in combination. After unsafe practices, specificindicators may again be absent. Prompt testing for both alcohol and drugsmay therefore be indicated, but it may not be administratively practicalto conduct both breath analysis and urine drug test. Even if breath analysisequipment is available, it may not be portable; or it may be unrealisticto introduce such equipment in the context where the employee may be found(e.g., where the employees is receiving treatment in a medical facility).This section, together with the new appendix D, sets forth the technicalstandards for urine alcohol analysis. Appendix D is based on the existingField Manual note regarding urine alcohol testing. In brief, the procedurecalls for a two-sample procedure. At the time of provision of the firstsample, which would normally be used for drug analysis under subpart H,the employee would be directed to entirely void the bladder. A waitingperiod would be observed during which the employee might be offered fluids.A second sample would then be collected for urine alcohol analysis. Sincethis sample would represent urine delivered to the bladder during the intervalbetween the first and second collections, and since urine is produced inthe kidney from blood, the urine alcohol level of the second sample willmirror the blood alcohol level. However, alcohol is found in body fluidsin proportion to the water content of the fluid. Urine has a higher watercontent than blood. It is therefore necessary to divide the urine alcohollevel by 1.5, which provides an acceptable estimate of average BAC in theinterval between the first and second sample.A sample collected under appendix D would be placed in a standard urinecollection bottle containing at least 1% sodium fluoride (w/v) as a preservative.Except as otherwise specified, collection, handling and retention of theurine specimen would be the same as provided for drug analysis in subpartH. Thus, for example, the original sample container would be required tobe retained in a separate accessioning/aliquoting/storage area at all times.Quantitative test results would be reported to the Medial Review Officer,who would review and act upon the results in the same manner provided insubpart H, except that both a quantitated urine alcohol level and estimatedBAC would be reported to the employer. Where this procedure is followed,an employee would have the option of providing a blood sample for analysis.This might be advantageous to an employee who has consumed alcohol offduty and is unable to completely void the bladder because of a physicaldisorder, but should not be viewed as obligatory by any employee, sincethe Medical Review Officer will be available to evaluate and take intoconsideration such explanations.Laboratory analysis would incorporate standard forensic alcohol testingtechniques, and internal quality control provisions would be similar tothose required for urine drug testing. FRA requests comment on the qualificationsof laboratories to perform this testing and the problem of external qualitycontrol and reserves the right to include specific requirements in thefinal rule. Such requirements could, include <T3>inter alia,</T3> participation in an external open proficiency testingsurvey, use of a laboratory certified by HHS/NIDA, use of a laboratorycertified under the Clinical Laboratory Improvement Act, and submissionof blind quality control specimens.The proposed alcohol screening provisions would take into account the availabilityof commercial immunoassays for alcohol. Screening would be at a level of.05% (w/v), which is equivalent to an achieved BAC below .04%. Publishedliterature suggests certain available assays are reliable at this levelbut less information exists with respect to lower levels. Confirmationwould be by gas chromatography (GC), which is scientifically and forensicallyrecognized as the preferred method of confirming volatiles such as ethylalcohol. If the GC method is used for both screening and confirmation,two different columns must be employed to ensure specific identificationof ethyl alcohol. FRA believes that a combination of two analytically distinctmethods (e.g., immunoassay and GC, or dichromate oxidation and GC) shouldsatisfy the requirement of specificity without requiring two GC analysesunder different conditions, but requests comment on this issue.The proposed criteria for protocols would require use of a suitable internalstandard, external (ethyl alcohol) standards, and controls. FRA would notspecify which of several GC methods should be employed. A cutoff of .05%would also be used for reporting after confirmation.<T3>Section 219.309</T3> of the rule addresses the presumption of impairmentfrom a positive urine test, a subject with respect to which FRA requestscomment above. FRA proposes to amend the notice required by paragraph (b)to reflect the addition of andSection; 219.102 and the provision regardingnotice of company policy would likewise be revised to require the companyto express any distinctions between consequences of a positive for a persondetermined to have been impaired or used the drug on the job in contrastto drug use other than on the job.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart E_Identification of Troubled Employees</ITAG>As issued in 1985, this subpart requires that railroads adopt policiesto encourage the voluntary referral of covered employees for treatmentand co-worker identification of those who are unsafe to work with. Thekey to the success of these concepts is that, if the employee accepts helpand successfully completes treatment, the employee's position is protected.This subpart has worked well in practice and does not require extensiverevision.<T3>Sections 219.403 and 219.405</T3> would be amended to reference thenew andSection; 219.102.FRA solicits comments regarding whether employees reported under the co-workerreport provision should be subject to follow-up testing, either on a mandatorybasis or at the option of the employer. Although FRA would much prefernot to include follow-up testing in the case of voluntary referrals, sincesuch a requirement could discourage referrals, commenters may wish to addressthis issue, as well.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart E_Pre-employment Drug Screens</ITAG>The pre-employment drug screen requirement applies to applicants for positionsthat include covered service. Testing is required for certain drugs, andemployers may include alcohol. As currently worded, the provision doesnot require testing on transfer from non-covered to covered service.FRA proposes to make several changes to this program further to ensuresound scientific practice in testing and to increase the effectivenessof the program.<T3>Section 219.501</T3> would be amended to emphasize that the pre-employmentdrug testing procedure must be complete (i.e., a negative report must havebeen provided to the employer) before the individual enters covered service.The section would also be amended to require testing of any present employeewho seeks to transfer from non-covered to covered service. FRA believesthat, although a period of service with any employer does provide a certainamount of information concerning fitness, it is necesssary to verify thatan employee seeking to transfer to covered service is not currently usingprohibited controlled substances. Drug abuse habits may begin at any timeand may require a period of some duration before they manifest themselvesthrough a negative impact on job performance. Those who will be subjectto other forms of testing as covered employees, including random testing,should come to covered service free of any problems that would requireremedial action. Addressing this ``gateway'' is particularly importantgiven the fact that the railroad industry continues in a period of generallydeclining employment and often seeks new engineers, dispatchers and otheremployees from the ranks of those already in its employ. Where performanceof a safety-sensitive function is in question, testing of internal applicantsis clearly warranted from the point of view of Fourth Amendment law. <T3>National Treasury Employees Union </T3>v.<T3> von Raab, </T3>109 S. Ct. 1384 (March 21, 1989).Based on contacts with representative railroad employers, FRA estimatesthat this proposal would result in not more than 500 employees being testedin any given year for the foreseeable future. In many cases, railroadsare already requiring medically-based testing in this context. However,in some cases testing is not conducted; and the impetus of a Federal mandatemay be necessary to ensure obstacles are not interposed.Paragraph (c) would be amended to conform this subpart to subpart H and49 CFR part 40.Paragraph (d) would be revised to address the issue of urine alcohol testing.FRA currently authorizes railroads to test for alcohol in the pre-employmentcontext. However, FRA believes that more rigorous standards are neededif such testing is to continue. The proposed rule would require noticeto the employee that the sample will be tested for alcohol, as well ascontrolled substances. Since the only legitimate purpose of pre-employmentalcohol testing is to identify possible alcohol abuse, the two-sample techniqueused for reasonable cause testing will not be necessary in this context;however, otherwise the same technical standards should apply. A suitablyhigh cutoff should be used to limit issues concerning recent social drinking;.10% urine alcohol is proposed (equivalent to an attained BAC of almost.08%). The rule would also require that all applicants testing positivebe handled in the same manner (pursuant to company policy) to ensure fairnessand avoid use of the testing procedure to produce discriminatory hiringoutcomes.<T3>Section 219.503</T3> would be amended to conform recordkeeping andreporting under this section to subpart H.<T3>Section 219.505</T3> would specify that an applicant who is makingnon-medical use of a controlled substance, as evidenced by a positive testreported by the MRO under subpart H, not be employed on the basis of theapplication for which the test was taken.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart G_Random Drug Testing Program</ITAG>The random drug testing provisions were issued last November after extensivepublic comment and do not require significant revision at this time. Thefew changes proposed here are of an editorial, clarifying or organizationalnature and do not affect the structure or basic requirements for the subpart.<T3>Section 219.601(b)(6)</T3> would be amended to clarify the circumstancesunder which employees who work in covered service only a portion of thetime may be subject to random testing. Such employees may include clerkswho occasionally are assigned to duties involving communication of trainorders, electricians who sometimes are called upon to work on cab signalapparatus, and other employees (including, particularly on smaller railroads,supervisors). The objective of the current rule provisions was to ensuretesting each employee who actually performs covered service perceives thepossibility that he or she may be subject to testing on a random basis.At the same time, it would make little sense to require that employeeswho work in covered service only two or three days per year be tested asfrequently as those who work in covered service on a regular basis. FRAhas therefore provided advice that, although ``occasional'' Hours of Serviceemployees should be included in the pools from which names or other identifiersare selected, they should be considered available for testing only duringthose periods they are on duty in covered service. (Under the Hours ofService act, an entire duty tour is ``covered service'' if any safety-sensitivefunctions subject to the Act are assigned for performance during the dutytour.) The clarifying amendment is intended to ensure that all railroadsunderstand this principle. Obviously, the problem addressed by the amendmentdoes not arise to any significant extent where the railroad's plan selectsHours of Service positions or position units, since whoever fills the positionon any given day will be subject to testing.<T3>Section 219.603(b)(3)</T3> would be deleted, since equivalent languageof broader scope is being proposed for inclusion in andSection; 219.11.<T3>Section 219.605</T3> deals with procedures for drug urine laboratoryreports that indicate presence of a drug. Paragraph (b) would be revisedto reference the new andSection; 219.104, which deals with handling of apositive test result. (Provisions of subpart H already address the mannerin which results will be reported.) Paragraphs (c) through (e) would bedeleted, since the subject matter would be contained in andSection; 219.104.<T3>Section 219.607</T3> (records retention) would be moved to a new andSection;219.713, since it will apply to all forms of company records relating totesting under the part.<T3>Section 219.609</T3> (small railroad exlusion) would be deleted, sincethe same exclusion will be contained in a revised andSection; 219.3.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart H_Procedures and Safeguards for Urine Drug Testing</ITAG>This subpart would also be amended exclusively for editorial and organizationalpurposes. <T3>Section 219.707 </T3>(MRO review). FRA requests comment on whetherparagraph (c) should be amended to modify or delete the requirement thatthe employee be provided a copy of the MRO-approved test results within48 hours of delivery to the railroad officer, or immediately upon the railroad'staking any action adverse to the employee, whichever first occurs. In afiling on 49 CFR Part 40, the Association of American Railroads (AAR) hasexpressed concerns that it may not be physically possible to transmit thetest result within the limitations stated. FRA appreciates the concernraised by the AAR; however, FRA has also noted instances where employeeshave been removed from service without receiving copies of test resultsfor extended periods, despite current rule provisions requiring promptdelivery. Paragraph (d) would be amended by deleting the final sentence of the paragraph.This text would be moved to andSection; 219.711(b) and amended for clarity.<T3>Section 219.709(a) </T3>would be amended to correct a typographicalerror (``within the 365-day period''). <T3>Section 219.711(a) </T3>would be amended by adding text derived fromandSection; 219.707(d) regarding the MRO's responsibility for confidentialityof medical information. FRA notes that the reference in this provisionto use, in an established medical qualifications program, of medical informationdisclosed incident to the testing does not provide license to short-cutthe medical review process. It is not intended that an MRO who is alsoa company medical officer (as will often be the case in the railroad industry)could medically disqualify an individual before a test reported as positiveby the laboratory is fully reviewed. On the other hand, if the employeedoes provide information that suggests the presence of an underlying medicaldisorder that the employee is required by contract to disclose to the employer'smedical office, or if verbal communication or laboratory results indicateuse of drugs with potential adverse side effects that would normally besubject to review under the medical program, this information would betreated in the same fashion as information otherwise disclosed to the companymedical officer as required under the employment contact. In the railroadindustry, major railroads have a long history of maintaining medical qualificationsprograms for key safety-sensitive employees. Existing paragraph (b) of this section would be designated as paragraph(c). The requirements of current paragraph (c) would be included in andSection;219.211 of subpart C, since it applies to post-accident testing under thesubpart. FRA also requests comment on the extent to which there is tension betweenthe Subpart H confidentiality policy for drug test results and the requirementof 49 CFR 225.17 that railroads report to FRA any information relatingto alcohol or drug use in an accident/incident.This issue may arise inrelation to reasonable cause tests conducted following qualifying accidentsand incidents. Comment is also requested concerning how any such tensionshould be addressed to protect against unnecessary disclosure while providingsufficient information pertinent to accident/incident causation. <T3>Section 219.713 </T3>of the proposed amendments is derived from currentsection andSection; 219.607. The section heading is amended to remove thereference to ``confidentiality,'' which is separately treated in andSection;219.711.<T3>Appendix A </T3>of the current rule provides for civil penalties, whichwere recently adjusted to reflect increases in the statutory range providedby the Rail Safety and Service Improvement Act of 1988. <T3>See </T3>53 FR 52918, 52928-30, Dec. 29, 1988. FRA proposes, at thetime of final rule, to make conforming changes to the penalty schedulegenerally consistent with the approach and penalty amounts presently inplace. FRA will consider any comments received on this issue. <T3>Appendix C </T3>would set out procedures for post-accident toxicologicaltesting (sample collection and handling). FRA believes that significantimprovements can be made in the approach used to collection and documentationof post-accident tests based on developments since issuance of the rulein 1985 and experience in program admistration. FRA has endeavored to emphasizesimplicity (in order to foster orderly and successful collections at medicalfacilities) and proper identification and securing of specimens (in orderto protect the rights of employees). An effort has been made to have theseprocedures parallel as closely as possible the procedures for urine collectionsunder the DOT Procedures. However, mandatory post-accident collectionshave the following characteristics that set them aside from most occupationaldrug testing programs: andbullet; Collections must always be conducted at medical facilities.andbullet; Blood, as well as urine, must be provided. andbullet; Employees to be tested may include personnel injured in the accident.andbullet; Individual collections are typically of greater significance thanthose for random tests and most other types of tests. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">These factors have a number of ramifications for collection procedures.For instance, although stringently managed urine collections are encouraged,measures to ensure against tampering by the donor are less critical wherea blood sample is available. If a urine specimen appears to be dilute orto contain an adulterant, the blood can be screened for drugs of interest.(Alcohol screening is routinely conducted using the blood sample.) Urinecollection procedures generally assume the provision of a single specimen.Where blood must be collected, as well, additional complications are introducedwith respect to maintenance and documentation of chain of custody. Injuredemployees cannot be expected to provide samples at a pre-designated collectionsite in every case, but must be approached humanely and with appropriateflexibility and sensitivity in the clinical environment. Even rather minorinjuries may lead to administration of drugs that will be detected in latertesting, and serious injuries may result in administration of whole bloodor plasma from another donor; it is therefore important contemporaneouslyto obtain information concerning medical treatment resulting from the accidentor casualty. Personal identifying information must be included on the collectionforms provided to the laboratory and FRA, since neither is in privity withthe employee so as to have available a social security number, assignmenton the date of the accident, or a mailing address. Similarly, medical druguse must be reflected on the collection form for the following reasons:(i) To obtain the best information concerning recent drug use and dosage(i.e., before the employee's memory has faded), (ii) to allow prompt usein the context of the accident investigation and (iii) to ensure accuratedeclarations. If facial defects appear in the collection process, routinenullifying of the test is not indicated, since the specimens representevidence that may be critical to an accident investigation. Instead, effortsmay be made to determine if any error could have affected sample identityor integrity; and any apparent gaps in custody and control must be reviewedto determine if continuity of custody and control can be documented. Thepost-accident collection process and FRA's administrative procedures areintended to take into acccount each of these concerns. FRA notes three possible approaches to documentation of post-accident specimenchain-of-custody from collection to sealing in the toxicology kit. Chain-of-custodydocumentation could be provided (1) On a single form for both blood andurine of an individual employee, (2) on separate blood and urine formsfor each employee, or (3) on batch urine and batch blood forms. It is importantthat the system established allow custody of each specimen to be followed(i.e., the documentation must follow the sample). In reviewing the systemproposed, commenters are asked to consider efficiency of collection andthe receptivity of medical facility personnel to the proposed system. <T3>Appendix D</T3> sets forth the method for collecting urine samplesfor alcohol analysis. This ``void and second sample'' procedure is derivedfrom FRA's 1985 Field Manual and has been utilized with evident successby at least one major rail system. It reflects the best information availableto FRA concerning urine alcohol analysis. FRA notes that urine is not apreferred specimen for alcohol analysis, since both breath and blood providea much more direct means of determining current blood alcohol concentration.However, circumstances will arise where it is not practical to performboth a urine drug collection and another type of test for alcohol. This``void and second sample'' procedure can provide a practical alternativeto invasive blood testing. FRA specifically solicits comments on the experienceof the industry in using this technique.In incorporating the procedure into the regulations, FRA has made severalmodifications to the procedure. For example, alcohol analysis is limitedto the second sample. Specific cautions are provided with respect to MROreview. Introductory matter has been eliminated, and the procedures wouldnow be required (where the railroad elects to utilize urine alcohol analysis)rather than recommended.Part 217Part 217 of title 49, Code of Federal Regulations, sets forth requirementsfor filing of railroad operating rules and for programs of operationaltests and inspections. Section 217.13 was amended at the time of 1985 alcohol/drugfinal rule to require filing of certain specific data concerning Rule Gobservations and violations and chemical tests (50 FR 31508, 31578, Aug.2, 1985). This section was further amended to reflect the random testingrequirements (53 FR 47102, 47131, Nov. 21, 1988). FRA has noted some difficultiesin administration of the original provisions, principally due to the decisionby some railroads to conduct for-cause testing under their own authorities,and has further noted the need to make the data collection elements consistent.Accordingly, FRA proposes further amendments to ensure that the data collectedis reasonably complete and useful as a means of tracking alcohol/drug compliance.Comment is solicited on any further refinements that might be made to thissection. In order to assist commenters, a copy of the proposed revisedform 6180.77 incorporating changes in the rule is reproduced at the endof this notice.Part 225Part 225 of title 49, Code of Federal Regulations, sets forth requirementsfor accident/incident reporting. Section 225.17 was amended at the timeof 1985 alcohol/drug final rule to require reporting of certain alcohol/druginformation relating to reportable accidents and casualties (50 FR 31508,31579, Aug. 2, 1985). The proposed amendment to the same section wouldmerely emphasize the obligation of the railroad to provide required datawith respect to reportable incidents (personal injuries), as well as trainaccidents. Such reporting has been included in the FRA accident/incidentreporting system since calendar 1986.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Impact</ITAG>This proposed rule has been evaluated in accordance with existing regulatorypolicies. It is not a ``major'' rule under Executive Order 12291, but itis deemed a ``significant'' rule as defined under DOT policies and procedures.FRA has considered the regulatory costs and benefits associated with theproposed rule and has tentatively determined that the costs of the revisionsare <T3>de minimis.</T3> Therefore, no further regulatory evaluation is warranted.Benefits of the proposed rule would include increased efficiency of programadministration and improved safety. However, FRA specifically requestspublic comment on the costs and benefits of the proposed rule and willconsider comments received in developing the final rule.The regulations proposed herein would not have substantial effects on thestates, on the relationship between the national government and the states,or on the distribution of power and responsibilities among the variouslevels of government. Thus, in accordance with Executive Order 12612, preparationof a Federalism Assessment is not warranted.It is certified that the proposed amendments will not have a significanteconomic impact of a substantial number of small entities under the provisionsof the Regulatory Flexibility Act (5 U.S.C. 60 et seq.). However, FRA specificallysolicits comment on the extent to which revision of andSection; 219.3(b)may impose regulatory burdens on certain small railroads. FRA also welcomesuggestions with respect to phased compliance with the proposed amendmentsin order to provide for adjustment to new regulatory obligations.FRA has evaluated these proposed regulations in accordance with its proceduresfor insuring full consideration of the environmental impacts of FRA actionsas required by the National Environmental Policy Act (45 U.S.C. 4321 etseq.), other environmental statutes, Executive Orders and DOT order 5610.1c.These proposed regulations meet the criteria that establish this as a non-majoraction for environmental purposes.Paperwork Reduction ActThe Paperwork Reduction Act (Pub. L. 96-511) applies because this proposedrule is expected to change several currently approved collections of information.The extent of the burden hours involved and what impact the changes willhave on currently approved clearances cannot be determined at this time.FRA solicits comments on burden estimates to complete these informationcollection requirements, the practical utility of the information, andalternative methods that might be less burdensome to obtain this information.Persons desiring to comment on this topic should submit their views inwriting to Ms. Gloria Swanson, Office of Safety, RRS-21, Federal RailroadAdministration, 400 Seventh Street, SW., Washington, DC 20590, and to Ms.Pamela Barr, Regulatory Policy Branch (OMB No. 2130-0526), Office of Managementand Budget, New Executive Office Building, 726 Jackson Place, NW., Washington,DC 20503. Copies of any such comments should also be submitted to the docketof this rulemaking at the address provided above. A request for OMB approvalof these revised information collection requirements will be made uponpreparation of a final rule document.<ITAG tagnum="84">Request for Public Comment</ITAG>FRA proposes to amend 49 CFR parts 217, 219 and 225 as set forth below.FRA solicits public comment on the proposed amendments, other issues raisedin this preamble, and any other matters pertaining to the administrationor enforcement of the alcohol/drug regulations that might warrant furtheramendment. FRA may make changes in the final rules based on comments receivedin response to this notice.Therefore, in consideration of the foregoing, FRA proposes to amend parts217, 219 and 225, title 49, Code of Federal Regulations as follows:<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects</ITAG>49 CFR Part 217Railroad safety, Railroad operating rules, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements.49 CFR Part 219Railroad safety, Control of alcohol and drug use, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements.49 CFR Part 225Railroad safety, Accident/incident reporting, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 219_[AMENDED]</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 219 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>45 U.S.C. 431, 437, and 438, as amended; Pub. L. 100-342;and 49 CFR 1.49(m).</ITAG>2. Amend Part 219 as follows:a. Revise the table of contents to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.1 Purpose and scope.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.3 Application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.5 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.7 Waivers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.9 Responsibility for compliance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.11 Consent required; implied.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.13 Preemptive effect.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.15 Alcohol concentration in blood and breath.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.17 Construction.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.19 Field Manual.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.21 Information collection.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.23 Notice to employees.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Prohibition</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.101 Alcohol and drug use prohibited.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.102 Prohibition on abuse of controlled substances.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.103 Prescribed and over-the-counter drugs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.104 Responsive action.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.105 Railroad's duty to prevent violations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_Post-Accident Toxicological Testing</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.201 Events for which testing is required.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.203 Responsibilities of railroads and employees.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.205 Sample collection and handling.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.207 Fatality.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.209 Reports of tests and refusals.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.211 Analysis and follow-up.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.213 Unlawful refusals; consequences.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart D_Authorization to Test for Cause</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.301 Testing for reasonable cause.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.303 Breath test procedures and safeguards.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.305 Urine test procedures and safeguards.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.307 Standards for urine alcohol assays.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.309 Presumption of impairment; notice.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart E_Identification of Troubled Employees</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.401 Requirement for policies.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.403 Voluntary referral policy.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.405 Co-worker report policy.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.407 Alternate policies.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart F_Pre-Employment Drug Screens</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.501 Pre-employment drug screens.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.503 Notification; records.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.505 Refusals; consequences of positive.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart G_Random Drug Testing Program</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.601 Railroad random testing programs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.603 Participation in testing; refusals.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.605 Postive test results; procedures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart H_Procedures and Safeguards for Urine Drug Testing</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.701 Standards for urine drug testing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.703 Collection.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.705 Drugs tested.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.707 Review by MRO.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.709 Retest.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.711 Confidentiality of test results.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">219.713 Reports; FRA access to records; confidentiality.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Appendix A to Part 219_Schedule of Civil Penalties</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Appendix B to Part 219_Designation of Laboratory for Post-Accident</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Toxicological Testing</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Appendix C to Part 219_Post-Accident Testing Sample Collection</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Appendix D to Part 219_Procedure for Collection of Urine Alcohol Specimen</ITAG>b. Revise andSection;219.3 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;219.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Application.</ITAG>(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), this part applies to_(1) Railroads that operate rolling equipment on standard gage track whichis part of the general railroad system of transportation; and(2) Railroads that provide commuter or other short-haul rail passengerservice in a metropolitan or suburban area (as described by section 202(e)of the Federal Railroad Safety Act of 1970, as amended).(b) Subparts D, E, F and G do not apply to a railroad that employs notmore than 15 employees covered by the Hours of service act (45 U.S.C. 61-64b)and that does not operate on tracks of another railroad (or otherwise engagein joint operations with another railroad) except as necessary for purposesof interchange.(c)(1) Subpart G of this part shall not apply to any person for whom compliancewith that subpart would violate the domestic laws or policies of anothercountry.(2) Subpart G is not effective until January 1, 1991, with respect to anyemployee whose place of reporting or point of departure (``home terminal'')for rail transportation services is located outside the territory of theUnited States.c. Revise andSection;219.5 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>As used in this part_<T3>Alcohol </T3>means ethyl alcohol (ethanol). References to use or possessionof alcohol include use or possession of any beverage, mixture or preparationcontaining ethyl alcohol.<T3>Class I, Class II, </T3>and <T3>Class III </T3>have the meaning assigned by regulations of the InterstateCommerce Commission (49 CFR part 1201), (General Instructions 1-1)) asthose regulations may be revised and applied by order of the Commission(including modifications in class thresholds based revenue deflator adjustments).<T3>Controlled substance </T3>has the meaning assigned by 21 U.S.C. 802and includes all substances listed on Schedules I through V as they maybe revised from time to time (21 CFR parts 1301-1316).<T3>Covered employee </T3>means a person who has been assigned to performservice subject to the Hours of Service Act (45 U.S.C. 61-64b) during aduty tour, whether or not the person has performed or is currently performingsuch service, and any person who performs such service.<T3>Covered service </T3>means service for a railroad that is subject tothe Hours of Service Act (45 U.S.C. 61-64b), but does not include any periodthe employee is relieved of all responsibilities and is free to come andgo without restriction.<T3>Co-worker </T3>means another employee of the railroad, including aworking supervisor directly associated with a yard or train crew, suchas a conductor or yard foreman, but not including any other railroad supervisor,special agent or officer.<T3>Drug </T3>means any substance (other than alcohol) that has known mindor function-altering effects on a human subject, specifically includingany psychoactive substance and including, but not limited to, controlledsubstances.<T3>EAP Counselor </T3>means a person or persons qualified by experience,education, or training to counsel persons affected by substance abuse problemsand to evaluate their progress in recovering from or controlling such problems.An ``EAP counselor'' may be a qualified full-time salaried employee ofthe railroad, a qualified practitioner who contracts with the railroadon a fee-for-service or other basis, or a qualified physician designatedby the railroad to perform functions in connection with alcohol or drugabuse evaluation or counseling. As used in these rules, an EAP Counselorowes a duty to the railroad to make an honest and fully informed evaluationof the condition and progress of the employee.<T3>Field Manual </T3>refers to the document described in andSection; 219.19of this subpart.<T3>FRA </T3>means the Federal Railroad Administration, U.S. Departmentof Transportation.<T3>FRA representative </T3>means the Associate Administrator for Safety,FRA, the Associate Administrator's delegate (including a qualified Stateinspector acting under part 212 of this chapter), the Chief Counsel, FRA,or the Chief Counsel's delegate.<T3>Hazardous material </T3>means a commodity designated as hazardous materialby part 172 of this title.<T3>Impact accident </T3>means a train accident (i.e., a rail equipmentaccident involving damage in excess of the current reporting threshold,$5,700 in 1989 and 1990) consisting of a head-on collision, a rear-endcollision, a side collision (including a collision at a railroad crossingat grade), a switching collision, or impact with a deliberately-placedobstruction such as a bumping post. The following are not impact accidents:(1) An accident in which the derailment of equipment causes an impact withother rail equipment;(2) Impact of rail equipment with obstructions such as fallen trees, rockor snow slides, livestock, etc.; and(3) Raking collisions caused by derailment of rolling stock or operationof equipment in violation of clearance limitations.<T3>Independent </T3>means not under the ownership or control of the railroad,not under common control with the railroad, and not operated or staffedby a salaried officer or employee of the railroad. The fact that the railroadpays for services rendered by a medical facility or laboratory, selectsthat entity for performing tests under this part, or has a standing contractualrelationship with that entity to perform tests under this part or performother medical examinations or tests of railroad employees does not, byitself, remove the facility from this definition.<T3>Medical facility </T3>means a hospital, clinic, physician's office,or laboratory where toxicological samples can be collected according torecognized professional standards.<T3>Medical practitioner </T3>means a physician or dentist licensed orotherwise authorized to practice by the state.<T3>Medical Review Officer </T3>or ``MRO'' refers to a licensed physiciandesignated by the railroad who is responsible for receiving laboratoryresults generated by the railroad's drug testing program (including testingmandated or authorized by this part) who has knowledge of substance abusedisorders and has appropriate medical training to interpret and evaluatean individual's positive test result (as reported by the laboratory) togetherwith his or her medical history and any other relevant biomedical information.<T3>NTSB </T3>means the National Transportation Safety Board.<T3>Possess </T3>means to have on one's person or in one's personal effectsor under one's control. However, the concept of possession as used in thispart does not include control by virtue of presence in the employee's personalresidence or other similar location off of railroad property.<T3>Railroad </T3>means all forms of non-highway ground transportationthat run on rails or electro-magnetic guideways, including (1) commuteror other short-haul rail passenger service in a metropolitan or suburbanarea, as well as any commuter rail service which was operated by ConsolidatedRail Corporation as of January 1, 1979, and (2) high speed ground transportationsystems that connect metropolitan areas, without regard to whether theyuse new technologies not associated with traditional railroads. Such termdoes not include rapid transit operations within an urban area that arenot connected to the general railroad system of transportation.<T3>Railroad property damage </T3>or ``damage to railroad property'' refersto damage to railroad property, including railroad on-track equipment,signals, track, track structures (including bridges and tunnels), or roadbed,including labor costs and all other costs for repair or replacement inkind. Estimated cost for replacement of railroad property shall be calculatedas described in the FRA Guide for Preparing Accident/Incident Reports.(See 49 CFR andSection; 225.21.) However, replacement of passenger equipmentshall be calculated based on the cost of acquiring a new unit for comparableservice.<T3>Reportable injury </T3>means an injury reportable under part 225 ofthis title.<T3>Reporting threshold </T3>means the amount specified in andSection; 225.19(c)of this title, as adjusted from time to time in accordance with appendixA to part 225 of this title (i.e., $5,700 in 1989 and 1990).<T3>Supervisory employee </T3>means an officer, special agent, or otheremployee of the railroad who is not a co-worker and who is responsiblefor supervising or monitoring the conduct or performance of one or moreemployees.<T3>Train, </T3>except as context requires, means a locomotive, or morethan one locomotive coupled, with or without cars. (A locomotive is a self-propelledunit of equipment which can be used in train service.)<T3>Train accident </T3>means a passenger, freight, or work train accidentdescribed in andSection; 225.19(c) of this title (a ``rail equipment accident''involving damage in excess of the current reporting threshold, $5,700 in1989 and 1990), including an accident involving a switching movement.<T3>Train incident </T3>means an event involving the movement of railroadon-track equipment that results in a casualty but in which railroad propertydamage does not exceed the reporting threshold.d. Revise andSection; 219.9 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.9</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Responsibility for compliance.</ITAG>(a) Any person (including a railroad and any manager, supervisor, official,or other employee or agent of a railroad) who violates any requirementof this part or causes the violation of any such requirement is subjectto a civil penalty of at least $250 and not more than $10,000 per violation,except that: Penalties may be assessed against individuals only for willfulviolations; where a grossly negligent violation or a pattern of repeatedviolations has created an imminent hazard of death or injury, or has causeddeath or injury, a penalty not to exceed $20,000 per violation may be assessed;and the standard of liability for a railroad will vary depending upon therequirement involved. See, e.g., andSection; 219.105, which shall be construedto qualify the responsibility of a railroad for the unauthorized conductof an employee that violates andSection; 219.101 or andSection; 219.102 (whileimposing a duty of due diligence to prevent such conduct). Each day a violationcontinues shall constitute a separate offense. See appendix A to this partfor a statement of agency civil penalty policy.(b) In the case of joint operations, primary responsibility for compliancewith this part with respect to determination of events qualifying for breathor body fluid testing under Subparts C and D or this part shall rest withthe host railroad, and all affected employees shall be responsive to directionfrom the host railroad consistent with this part. However, nothing in thisparagraph shall restrict the ability of the railroads to provide for anappropriate assignment of responsibility for compliance with this partas among those railroads through a joint operating agreement or other bindingcontract. FRA reserves the right to bring an enforcement action for noncompliancewith applicable portions of this part against the host railroad, the employingrailroad, or both.e. By revising section 209.11 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.11</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Consent required; implied.</ITAG>(a) Any employee who performs covered service for a railroad on or afterFebruary 10, 1986, shall be deemed to have consented to testing as requiredin subparts B, C, D, and G of this part; and consent is implied by performanceof such service.(b)(1) Each such employee shall participate in such testing, as requiredunder the conditions set forth in this part by a representative of therailroad.(2) In any case where an employee has sustained a personal injury and issubject to alcohol or drug testing under this part, necessary medical treatmentshall be accorded priority over provision of the breath or body fluid sample.No employee who is unable to urinate normally (based on the judgment ofa medical professional that catheterization would be required) as a resultof a personal injury or incident medical treatment shall be required toprovide a urine sample.(3) Failure to remain available following an accident or casualty as requiredby company rules (i.e., being absent without leave) shall be considereda refusal to participate in testing, without regard to any subsequent provisionof samples.(4) Tampering with a sample in order to prevent a valid test (e.g., throughsubstitution, dilution or adulteration) constitutes a refusal to providea sample.(c) A covered employee who is required to be tested under subpart C orD and who is taken to a medical facility for observation or treatment afteran accident or incident shall be deemed to have consented to the releaseto FRA of the following:(1) The remaining portion of any body fluid sample taken by the treatingfacility within 12 hours of the accident or incident that is not requiredfor medical purposes, together with any normal medical facility record(s)pertaining to the taking of such sample;(2) The results of any laboratory tests for alcohol or any drug conductedby or for the treating facility on such sample; and(3) The identity, dosage, and time of administration of any drugs administeredby the treating facility prior to the time samples were taken by the treatingfacility or prior to the time samples were taken in compliance with thispart.(d) An employee required to participate in body fluid testing under SubpartC (post-accident toxicological testing), Subpart D (reasonable cause testing),or Subpart G (random testing) shall, if requested by the representativeof the railroad or the medical facility (including under Subpart G of thispart, a non-medical contract collector), evidence consent to taking ofsamples, their release for toxicological analysis under pertinent provisionsof this part, and release of the test results to the railroad's MedicalReview Officer by promptly executing a consent form, if required by themedical facility. The employee is not required to execute any documentor clause waiving rights that the employee would otherwise have againstthe employer, and any such waiver is void. Any consent provided consistentwith this section shall be construed to extend only to those actions specifiedherein.(e) Nothing in this part shall be construed to authorize the use of physicalcoercion or any other deprivation of liberty in order to compel breathor body fluid testing.(f) Any railroad employee who performs service for a railroad on or afterFebruary 10, 1986, shall be deemed to have consented to removal of bodyfluid and/or tissue samples necessary for toxicological analysis from theremains of such employee, if such employee dies within 12 hours of an accidentor incident described in subpart C as a result of such event. This consentis specifically required of employees not in covered service, as well asemployees in covered service.(g) Nothing in this subpart restricts any discretion available to the railroadto request or require that an employee cooperate in additional body fluidtesting. However, no such testing may be performed on urine or blood samplesprovided under this part. For purposes of this paragraph, all urine froma void constitutes a single sample.f. Amend andSection; 219.19 by revising paragraph (a) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.19</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Field Manual.</ITAG>(a) Recommended practice standards for breath testing under subpart D ofthis part, and relataed materials designed to assist the railroads in establishingprograms for control of alcohol and drug use are contained in the FRA Alcoholand Drug Field Manual, which is revised from time to time by the Officeof Safety, FRA.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>g. Add at the end of Subpart A a new andSection; 219.23 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.23</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice to employees.</ITAG>(a) Whenever a breath or body fluid test is required of an employee underthis part, the railroad shall provide clear and unequivocal written noticeto the employee that the test is being required under Federal RailroadAdministration regulations. Rather than providing written notice for eachindividual test, a company that requires breath and/or body fluid testsonly under the authority of this part for a clearly delineated portionof its employees may satisfy this requirement by publishing this fact ina manner that provides effective notice to each employee.(b) Whenever a breath or body fluid test is required of an employee underthis part, the railroad shall provide clear, unequivocal written noticeof the basis or bases upon which the test is required (e.g., reasonablesuspicion, violation of a specified operating/safety rule enumerated insubpart D, random selection, follow-up, etc.). Annotation of the urinecustody and control form with the specific basis of the test (prior toproviding a copy to the employee) satisfies the requirement of this paragraph.(c) Use of approved forms for mandatory post-accident toxicological testingunder subpart C of this part provides the notifications required underthis section with respect to such tests. Use of those forms for any othertest is prohibited.h. Amend andSection; 219.103 by revising paragraph (a) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.103 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prescribed and over-the-counter drugs.</ITAG>(a) This subpart does not prohibit the use of a controlled substance (onSchedule II through V of the controlled substance list) prescribed or authorizedby a medical practitioner, or possession incident to such use, if_(1) The treating medical practitioner or a physician designated by therailroad has made a good faith judgment, with notice of the employee'sassigned duties and on the basis of the available medical history, thatuse of the substance by the employee at the prescribed or authorized dosagelevel is consistent with the safe performance of the employee's duties;(2) The substance is used at the dosage prescribed or authorized; and(3) In the event the employee is being treated by more than one medicalpractitioner, at least one treating medical practitioner has been informedof all medications authorized or prescribed and has determined that useof the medications is consistent with the safe performance of the employee'sduties (and the employee has observed any restrictions imposed with respectto use of the medications in combination).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>i. Add at the end of subpart B new andSection;andSection; 219.104 and 219.105to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.104 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Responsive action.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Removal from covered service.</T3> If the railroad determines thatthere is reason to believe that an employee has violated andSection; 219.101or 219.102, as evidenced by a positive test result reported by the railroad'sMedical Review Officer for a test conducted under subpart C, subpart Dor subpart G of this part, the railroad shall immediately remove the employeefrom covered service.(b) <T3>Hearing procedures. </T3>(1) Prior to or upon withdrawing the employeefrom covered service under this section, the railroad shall provide noticeof the reason for this action and an opportunity for hearing before a presidingofficer other than the charging official. This hearing may be consolidatedwith any other disciplinary hearing arising from the same accident or incident(or conduct directly related thereto), but the presiding officer shallmake separate findings as to compliance with andSection;andSection; 219.101and 219.102 of this part.(2) The hearing shall be convened within the period specified in the applicablecollective bargaining agreement. In the absence of an agreement provision,the employee may demand that the hearing be convened within 10 calendardays of the suspension or, in the case of an employee who is unavailabledue to injury, illness, or other sufficient cause, within 10 days of thedate the charged employee becomes available for hearing.(3) A post-suspension proceeding conforming to the requirements of an applicablecollective bargaining agreement, together with the provisions for adjustmentof disputes under section 3 of the Railway Labor Act, shall be deemed tosatisfy the procedural requirements of this paragraph.(4) Nothing in this part shall be deemed to abridge any additional proceduralrights or remedies not inconsistent with this part that are available tothe employee under a collective bargaining agreement, the Railway LaborAct, or (with respect to employment at will) at common law with respectto the removal or other adverse action taken as a consequence of a positivetest result in a test authorized or required by this part.(c) <T3>Return to covered service.</T3> An employee who has been determinedto have violated andSection; 219.101 or andSection; 219.102 of this part shallnot be returned to covered service unless the employee has_(1) Been evaluated by an EAP counselor to determine if the employee isaffected by a psychological or physical dependence on alcohol or one ormore controlled substances or by another identifiable and treatable mentalor physical disorder involving abuse of alcohol or drugs as a primary manifestation;(2) Successfully completed any program of counseling or treatment determinedto be necessary by the EAP counselor prior to return to covered service;and(3) Presented a urine sample for testing under this subpart that testednegative for controlled substances assayed and has tested negative foralcohol under paragraph (d) of this section.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">An employee returned to service under the above-stated conditionsshall continue in any program of counseling or treatment deemed necessaryby the EAP counselor and shall be subject to a reasonable program of follow-updrug and alcohol testing without prior notice for a period of not morethan 60 months following return to service.(d) <T3>Follow-up tests.</T3> Return-to-service and follow-up tests under paragraph(c) of this section shall include_(1) Analysis of a urine specimen for controlled substances consistent withthe requirements of subpart H of this part; and(2) One of the following tests performed while the employee is in dutystatus:(i) Analysis of a breath specimen for alcohol under safeguards consistentwith those specified for reasonable cause breath testing under subpartC of this part; or(ii) Analysis of a second urine specimen for alcohol in the same manneras prescribed in andSection; 219.307 and Appendix D to this part (but theemployee shall also have option to provide a blood sample for alcohol analysis).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.105 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Railroad's duty to prevent violations.</ITAG>(a) A railroad may not willfully permit an employee to go or remain onduty in covered service in violation of the prohibitions of andSection; 219.101or andSection; 219.102. As used in this section, the knowledge imputed tothe railroad shall be limited to that of a railroad management employee(such as a supervisor deemed an ``officer,'' whether or not such personis a corporate officer) or a supervisory employee in the offending employee'schain of command.(b) A railroad must exercise due diligence to assure compliance with andSection;219.101 and andSection; 219.102 by each covered employee.J. Revise andSection; 219.201 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.201 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Events for which testing is required.</ITAG>(a) <T3>List of events. </T3>On and after March 10, 1986, except as providedin paragraph (b) of this section, post-accident toxicological tests shallbe conducted after any event that involves one or more of the circumstancesdescribed in paragraphs (a) (1) through (3) of this section:(1) <T3>Major train accident. </T3>Any train accident (i.e., a rail equipmentaccident involving damage in excess of the current reporting threshold,andSection; 5,700 in 1989 and 1990) that involves one or more of the following:(i) A fatality;(ii) Release of a hazardous material lading from railroad equipment accompaniedby_(A) An evacuation; or(B) A reportable injury resulting from the hazardous material release (<T3>e.g., </T3>from fire, explosion, inhalation, or skin contact with thematerial);(iii) Damage to railroad property of $500,000 or more; or(iv) Reportable injury to any person in a train accident involving a passengertrain.(2) <T3>Impact accident. </T3>An impact accident (i.e., a rail equipment accidentdefined as an ``impact accident'' in andSection; 219.5 of this part thatinvolves damage in excess of the current reporting threshold, $5,700 in1989 and 1990) resulting in_(i) A reportable injury; or(ii) Damage to railroad property of $50,000 or more.(3) <T3>Fatal train incident. </T3>Any train incident that involves a fatalityto any on-duty railroad employee.(b) <T3>Exceptions. </T3>No test shall be required in the case of a collisionbetween railroad rolling stock and a motor vehicle or other highway conveyanceat a rail/highway grade crossing. No test shall be required in the caseof an accident/incident the cause and severity of which are wholly attributableto a natural cause (e.g., flood, tornado or other natural disaster), asdetermined on the basis of objective and documented facts by the railroadrepresentative responding to the scene.(c) <T3>Good faith determinations. </T3>(1) The railroad representative respondingto the scene of the accident/incident shall determine whether the accident/incidentfalls within the requirements of paragraph (a) of this section or is withinthe exception described in paragraph (b) of this section. It is the dutyof the railroad representative to make reasonable inquiry into the factsas necessary to make such determinations. In making such inquiry, the railroadrepresentative shall consider the need to obtain samples as soon as practicalin order to determine the presence or absence of impairing substances reasonablycontemporaneous with the accident/incident. The railroad representativesatisfies the requirement of this section if, after making reasonable inquiry,the representative exercises good faith judgment in making the requireddeterminations. The railroad representative making the determination requiredby this section shall not be a person directly involved in the accident/incident.This section does not prohibit consultation between the responding railroadrepresentative and higher level railroad officials; however, the respondingrailroad representative shall make the factual determinations requiredby this section, and any decision by a person other than the respondingrailroad representative with respect to whether an accident/incident qualifiesfor testing shall be certified in writing by the decision maker within24 hours of the decision, setting forth the facts reported by the respondingrailroad representative, the basis upon which the testing decision wasmade, and the person making the decision. This decision memorandum shallbe made available to the FRA on request. However, any estimates of railroadproperty damage made by persons not on the scene shall be based on descriptionsof specific physical damage provided by the on-scene railroad representative.In the case of an accident involving passenger equipment, a host railroad(whether present on scene or not) in making the decision whether testingis required, subject to the same requirment that visible physical damagebe specifically described.(2) A railroad is not in violation of this subpart if its representativehas made such reasonable inquiry and exercised such good faith judgmentbut nevertheless errs in determining that post-accident testing is notrequired. This section does not excuse the railroad for any error arisingfrom a mistake of law (e.g., application of testing criteria other thanthose contained in these regulations).(3) A railroad does not act in excess of its authority under this subpartif its representative has made such reasonable inquiry and exercised suchgood faith judgment, but it is later determined, after investigation, thatone or more of the conditions thought to have required testing were not,in fact, present. (4) An accident/incident with respect to which the railroad has made reasonableinquiry and exercised good faith judgment in determining the facts necessaryto apply the criteria contained in paragraph (a) of this section is deemeda qualifying event for purposes of sample analysis, reporting, and otherpurposes. In the event samples are collected following an event determinedby FRA not to be a qualifying event within the meaning of this paragraph,FRA directs its designated laboratory to destroy any sample material submittedand to refrain from disclosing to any person the results of any analysisconducted.k. Amend andSection;219.203 by revising paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;219.203 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Responsibilities of railroads and employees. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Employees tested. </T3>(1) Following each accident and incident describedin andSection;219.201, the railroad (or railroads) shall take all practicablesteps to assure that all covered employees of the railroad directly involvedin the accident or incident provide blood and urine samples for toxicologicaltesting by FRA. Such employees shall cooperate in the provision of samplesas described in this subpart and appendix C. (2) Such employees shall specifically include each and every operatingemployee assigned as a crew member of any train involved in the accidentor incident. In any case where an operator, dispatcher, signal maintaineror other covered employee is directly and contemporaneously involved inthe circumstances of the accident/incident, those employees shall alsobe required to provide samples. (3) An employee shall be excluded from testing under the following circumstances:In any case of an accident/incident for which testing is mandated onlyunder andSection;219.201(a)(2) of this subpart (an ``impact accident'') or219.201(a)(3) (``fatal train incident''), if the railroad representativecan immediately determine, on the basis of specific information, that theemployee had no role in the cause(s) or severity of the accident/incident.(4) The following provisions govern accidents/incidents involving non-coveredemployees: (i) Surviving non-covered employees are not subject to testing under thissubpart. (ii) Testing of the remains of non-covered employees who are fatally injuredin train accidents and incidents is required. (b) <T3>Timely sample collection. </T3>(1) The railroad shall make every reasonableeffort to assure that samples are provided as soon as possible after theaccident or incident. (2) The paragraph shall not be construed to inhibit the employees requiredto be tested from performing, in the immediate aftermath of the accidentor incident, any duties that may be necessary for the preservation of lifeor property. However, where practical, the railroad shall utilize otheremployees to perform such duties. (3) In the case of a revenue passenger train which is in proper conditionto continue to the next station or its destination after an accident orincident, the railroad shall consider the safety and conveniences of passengersin determining whether the crew is immediately available for testing. Arelief crew shall be called to relieve the train crew as soon as possible.(4) Covered employees who may be subject to testing under this subpartshall be retained in duty status for the period necessary to make the determinationsrequired by andSection;219.201 and this section and (as appropriate) to completethe sample collection procedure. However, an employee may not be recalledfor testing under this subpart if that employee has been released fromduty by a railroad officer or supervisor with actual or apparent authorityto do so. An employee who has been transported to receive medical careis not released from duty for purposes of this section. Nothing in thissection prohibits the subsequent testing of an employee who has failedto remain available for testing as required (i.e., who is absent withoutleave); but subsequent testing does not excuse such refusal by the employeetimely to provide the required specimens. (c) <T3>Place of sample collection. </T3>(1) Employees shall be transportedto an independent medical facility where the samples shall be obtained.The railroad shall pre-designate for such testing one or more such facilitiesin reasonable proximity to any location where the railroad conducts operations.Designation shall be made on the basis of the willingness of the facilityto conduct sample collection and the ability of the facility to completesample collection promptly, professionally, and in accordance with pertinentrequirements of this part. In all cases blood shall be drawn only by aqualified medical professional or by a qualified technician subject tothe supervision of a qualified medical professional. (2) In the case of an injured employee, the railroad shall request thetreating medical facility to obtain the samples. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>l. Amend andSection;219.205 by revising paragraphs (a), (c) and (d) to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;219.205 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Sample collection and handling.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> Samples shall be obtained, marked, preserved, handled,and made available to FRA consistent with the requirements of this sectionand the technical specifications set forth in appendix C to this part.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) <T3>Shipping kit. </T3>(1) FRA and the laboratory designated in appendixB to this part make available for purchase a limited number of standardshipping kits for the purpose of routine handling of toxicological samplesunder this subpart. Whenever possible, samples shall be placed in the shippingkit prepared for shipment according to the instructions provided in thekit and appendix C. Specifications for kits are contained in the FieldManual.(2) Kits may be ordered directly from the laboratory designated in appendixB to this part.(3) FRA maintains a limited number of kits at its field offices. A ClassIII railroad may utilize kits in FRA possession, rather than maintainingsuch kits on its property.(d) <T3>Shipment.</T3> Samples shall be shipped as soon as possible by pre-paidair express or air freight (or other means adequate to ensure deliverywithin twenty-four (24) hours from time of shipment) to the laboratorydesignated in appendix B to this part. Whenever possible, the medical facilityshall transfer the sealed toxicology kit directly to an express courierfor transportation. If courier pickup is not available at the medical facilitywhere the samples are collected, the railroad shall promptly transportthe sealed shipping kit holding the samples to the nearest point of shipmentvia air express, air freight or equivalent means. The railroad shall maintainand document secure chain or custody of the kit from release by the medicalfacility to delivery for transportation, as described in appendix C.m. Amend andSection;219.207 by revising paragraph (d) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;219.207 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fatality.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) Appendix C to this part specifies body fluid and/or tissue samplesrequired for toxicological analysis in the case of a fatality.n. Revise andSection;219.211 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;219.211 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Analysis and follow-up.</ITAG>(a) The laboratory designated in appendix B to this part undertakes promptanalysis of samples provided under this subpart, consistent with the needto develop all relevant information and produce a complete report.(b) Effective January 16, 1990, results of post-accident toxicologicaltesting under subpart C of this part are reported to the railroad's MedicalReview Officer and the employee. The railroad shall treat the test resultsand any information concerning medical use or administration of drugs providedunder this subpart in the same confidential manner as if subject to subpartH of this part, except where publicly disclosed by FRA or the NationalTransportation Safety Board.(c) With respect to a surviving employee, a test reported as positive foralcohol or a controlled substance by the designated laboratory shall bereviewed by the railroad's Medical Review Officer in the same manner providedfor tests conducted under subpart H of this part. The Medical Review Officershall promptly report the results of each review to the Associate Administratorfor Safety, FRA, Washington, DC 20590. Such report shall be in writingand shall reference the employing railroad, accident/incident date, andlocation; and the envelope shall be marked ``CONFIDENTIAL: ATTENTION ALCOHOL/DRUGPROGRAM MANAGER.'' The report shall state whehter the test result was reportedto the railroad as positive or negative and the basis of any determinationthat analytes detected by the laboratory derived from authorized use (includinga statement of the compound prescribed, dosage, and any restrictions imposedby the authorized medical practitioner). Unless specifically requestedby FRA in writing, the Medical Review Officer shall not disclose to FRAthe underlying physical condition for which any medication was authorizedor administered. Neither the Federal Railroad Administration nor the NationalTransportation Safety Board shall be bound by the railroad Medical ReviewOfficer's determination, but that determination will be considered by FRAin relation to the accident/incident investigation and with respect toany enforcement action under consideration.(d) To the extent permitted by law, FRA treats test results indicatinguse of prescription or physician-administered controlled substances (andother information concerning medically authorized drug use or administrationprovided incident to such testing) as confidential and withholds publicdisclosure, except where it is necessary to consider this information inan accident investigation in relation to determination of probable cause.However, FRA may provide any result of testing under this subpart and associateddocuments to the National Transportation Safety Board.(e) An employee may respond in writing to the results of the test priorto the preparation of any final investigation report concerning the accidentor incident. An employee wishing to respond shall do so by letter addressedto the Associate Adminsistrator for Safety, FRA, 400 Seventh Street, SW.,Washington, DC 20590 within 45 days of receipt of the test results. Anysuch letter shall refer to the accident date, railroad and location andstate the position occupied by the employee on the date of the accident/incidentand shall identify any information contained therein that the employeerequests be withheld from public disclosure on grounds of personal privacy(but the decision whether to honor such request shall be made by the FRAon the basis of controlling law). Results of the toxicological analysisand any response from the employee are also promptly made available tothe National Transportation Safety Board on request.(f)(1) Toxicology report may contain a statement of pharmacological significanceto assist FRA and other parties in understanding the data reported. Nosuch statement may be construed as a finding of probable cause in the accidentor incident.(2) The toxicology report is a part of the report of the accident/incidentand therefore subject to the limitation of section 4 of the Accident ReportsAct (45 U.S.C. 41) (prohibiting use of the report for any purpose in anyaction for damages).(g)(1) It is in the public interest to ensure that any railroad disciplinaryactions that may result from accidents and incidents for which testingis required under this subpart are disposed of on the basis of the mostcomplete and reliable information available so that responsive action willbe appropriate. Therefore, during the interval between an accident or incidentand the date that the railroad receives notification of the results ofthe toxicological analysis, any provisions of collective bargaining agreementsestablishing maximum periods for charging employees with rule violations,or for holding an investigation, shall not be deemed to run as to any offenseinvolving the accident or incident (<T3>i.e.</T3>, such periods shall be tolled).(2) This provision shall not be construed to excuse the railroad from anyobligation to timely charge an employee (or provide other actual notice)where the railroad obtains sufficient information relating to alcohol ordrug use, impairment or possession or other rule violations prior to receiptof toxicological analysis.(3) This provision does not authorize holding any employee out of servicepending receipt of toxicological analysis; nor does it restrict a railroadfrom taking such action in an appropriate case.(h) Except as provided in andSection; 219.201 (with respect to nonqualifyingevents), each sample provided under this subpart is retained for not lessthan three months following the date of the accident or incident (two yearsfrom the date of the accident or incident in the case of a sample testingpositive for alcohol or a controlled substance) and may be made availableto the National Transportation Safety Board (on request).(i) An employee (donor) may, within 60 days of the date of the toxicologyreport, request that the employee's blood and/or urine sample be retestedby the designated laboratory or by another laboratory certified by theDepartment of Health and Human Services under that Department's Guidelinesfor Federal Workplace Drug Testing Programs that has available an appropriate,validated assay for the fluid and compound declared positive. Since someanalytes may deteriorate during storage, detected levels of the compoundshall, as technically appropriate, be reported and considered corroborativeof the original test result. Any request for a retest shall be in writing,specify the railroad, accident date and location, be signed by the employee/donor,be addressed to the Associate Administrator for Safety, FRA, Washington,DC 20590, and be designated ``CONFIDENTIAL: ATTENTION ALCOHOL/DRUG PROGRAMMANAGER.'' The expense of any employee-requested retest at a laboratoryother than the laboratory designated under this subpart shall be borneby the employee.o. Amend andSection; 219.213 by revising paragraph (a)(1), by adding a newparagraph (a)(4), and by revising paragraph (c) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.213 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Unlawful refusals; consequences.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Disqualification. </T3>(1) An employee who refuses to cooperate inproviding a blood or urine sample following an accident or incident specifiedin this subpart shall be withdrawn from covered service and shall be deemeddisqualified for covered service for a period of nine (9) months.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(4) Upon the expiration of the 9-month period described in this section,a railroad may permit the employee to return to covered service only underthe same conditions specified in andSection; 219.104 of this part.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) <T3>Subject of hearing. </T3>The hearing required by this section shalldetermine whether the employee refused to submit to testing, having beenrequested to submit, under authority of this subpart, by a representativeof the railroad. In determining whether a disqualification is required,the hearing official shall, as appropriate, also consider the following:(1) Whether the railroad made a good faith determination, based on reasonableinquiry, that the accident or incident was within the mandatory testingrequirements of this subpart; and(2) In a case where a blood test was refused on the ground it would beinconsistent with the employee's health, whether such refusal was madein good faith and based on medical advice.p. Amend andSection; 219.301 by revising paragraph (a), by republishing theintroductory text of paragraph (b), by revising paragraph (b)(3), and byrevising paragraph (f) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.301 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Testing for reasonable cause.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Authorization. </T3>A railroad may, under the conditions specifiedin this subpart, require any covered employee, as a condition of employmentin covered service, to cooperate in breath or urine testing, or both, todetermine compliance with andSection;andSection; 219.101 and 219.102 of thispart or a railroad rule implementing the requirements of andSection;andSection;219.101 and 219.102. This authority is limited to testing after observationsor events that occur during duty hours (including any period of overtimeor emergency service). The provisions of this subpart apply only when,and to the extent that, the test in question is conducted in reliance uponthe authority conferred by this section. Section 219.23 prescribes thenotice to an employee that is required when an employee is required toprovide a breath or body fluid sample under this part.(b) <T3>Reasonable cause for breath tests. </T3>The following circumstancesconstitute reasonable cause for the administration of breath tests underthis section:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(3) <T3>Rule violation. </T3>The employee has been directly involved in oneof the following operating rule violations or errors:(i) Noncompliance with a train order, track warrant, timetable, signalindication, special instruction or other direction with respect to movementof a train that involves_(A) Occupancy of a block or other segment of track to which entry was notauthorized;(B) Failure to clear a track to permit opposing or following movement topass;(C) Moving across a railroad crossing at grade without authorization; or(D) Passing an absolute restrictive signal or passing a restrictive signalwithout stopping (if required);(ii) Failure to protect a train as required by a rule consistent with andSection;218.37of this title (including failure to protect a train that is fouling anadjacent track, where required by the railroad's rules);(iii) Operation of a train at a speed that exceeds the maximum authorizedspeed by at least ten (10) miles per hour or by fifty percent (50%) ofsuch maximum authorized speed, whichever is less;(iv) Alignment of a switch in violation of a railroad rule, failure toalign a switch as required for movement, operation of a switch under atrain, or unauthorized running through a switch;(v) Failure to apply or stop short of derail as required; (vi) Failure to secure a hand brake or failure to secure sufficient handbrakes;(vii) Entering a crossover before both switches are lined for movement;or(viii) In the case of a person performing a dispatching function or blockoperator function, issuance of a train order or establishment of a routethat fails to provide proper protection for a train.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(f) <T3>Prompt sample collection; time limitation.</T3>(1) Testing under this subpart may only be conducted promptly followingthe observations or events upon which the testing decision is based, consistentwith the need to protect life and property.(2) Nothing in this section shall authorize testing of an employee afterthe expiration of an 8-hour period from_(i) The time of the observations or other events described in this section;or(ii) In the case of an accident/incident, the time a responsible railroadsupervisor receives notice of the event providing reasonable cause forconduct of the test.(3) An employee may not be tested under this subpart if that employee hasbeen released from duty. An employee who has been transported to receivemedical care is not released from duty for purposes of this section. Nothingin this section prohibits the subsequent testing of an employee who hasfailed to remain available for testing as required (i.e., who is absentwithout leave).(4) As used in this section a ``responsible railroad supervisor'' meansany responsible line supervisor (e.g., a trainmaster or road foreman ofengines) or superior official in authority over the employee to be tested.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>q. Amend andSection;219.303 by revising paragraph (c) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;219.303</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Breath test procedures and safeguards.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c)(1) In any case where a breath test is intended for use in the railroaddisciplinary process and the result is positive, the employee shall begiven the prompt opportunity to provide a blood sample at an independentmedical facility for analysis by a competent independent laboratory. Therailroad shall provide the required transportation to facilitate the bloodtest.(2) A blood test under this section shall conform to the following standards:(i) The specimen shall be collected in a medically acceptable manner bya qualified medical professional or technician using a non-ethanol swaband shall be deposited into a single-use sterile vacuum tube containingat least one percent sodium fluoride (and an anticoagulant).(ii) While the specimen remains in full view of the employee, the specimenshall be clearly labeled with the employee's name and/or a unique identifyingnumber and shall be sealed with a tamperproof seal.(iii) The sample shall be handled in accordance with chain of custody proceduresfrom the point of collection through analysis and secure storage at thelaboratory.(iv) The sample shall be screened for alcohol only by a method reliableat a detection limit of not higher than .02 percent. Any presumptive positiveshall be confirmed by gas chromatography with a suitable internal standard.The screening run shall include at least 10% quality control samples. Theconfirmation run shall include ethanol standards, at least one blank specimen,and at least one control purchased commercially or provided through anexternal quality control program. Results declared positive on confirmationshall be consistent with pre-established criteria for retention time ofinternal and external standards. Blood alcohol concentration shall be reportedonly at values of .02 percent or greater within the linear portion of thestandard curve. Unconfirmed presumptive positive results and values below.02 percent shall be reported as negative. Any quantitations to the thirddigit shall be rounded downward to two digits (i.e., .238% to .23%).(v) The remaining portion of any specimen testing positive shall be retainedfor at least one year, and the employee shall have the right to requesta retest of the specimen at a competent independent laboratory within 60days of the date of the laboratory report.(vi) Test results shall be reported to the Medical Review Officer who shallreview and act upon the results in the same manner provided for drug urinetesting in subpart H of this part, except that fully quantitated resultsshall be made available to the employer representative.(3) If the blood test under this section is reported as negative, the breathtest shall be deemed negative for all purposes.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>r. Revise andSection;219.305 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;219.305</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Urine test procedures and safeguards.</ITAG>(a) Effective January 16, 1990, the conduct of urine drug testing underthis subpart is governed by subpart H of this part and (to the extent notinconsistent with this part) part 40 of subtitle A of this title. However,urine shall be collected at the independent medical facility. Personnelof the medical facility shall supervise the collection procedure. (b) A urine test procedure may include the provision of not more thantwo samples from the same employee.(c) A railroad may analyze a urine sample provided under this part foralcohol only as specified in andSection;219.307 of this subpart.(d) In any case where a urine test is intended for use in the railroaddisciplinary process, the employee shall be given the opportunity to providea blood sample at an independent medical facility for analysis by a competentindependent laboratory. Alcohol analysis conducted on the blood specimen(which shall be performed in the event the urine sample is analyzed foralcohol) shall be in conformity with the standards set forth in andSection;219.303(c).s. Revise andSection;219.307 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;219.307</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standards for urine alcohol assays.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General requirements. </T3>Impairment of railroad employees may becaused by use of controlled substances, use of alcohol, or use of controlledsubstances and alcohol in combination. Accordingly, a railroad may causea urine sample collected under this subpart to be analyzed for alcoholsubject to the following additional conditions and safeguards.(1) The urine alcohol analysis shall be conducted on the second samplecollected under the procedure set forth in Appendix D to this part. Thesample container shall contain at least one percent sodium fluoride asa preservative. In all other respects not inconsistent with this section,the collection, handling and retention of the urine sample shall be thesame as required for drug urinalysis under subpart H of this part. Therailroad may only use the second sample for alcohol analysis under thissubpart.(2) The urine alcohol analysis shall conform to the requirements set forthin this section.(3) Quantitative test results shall be reported to the Medical Review Officerwho shall review and act upon the results in the same manner provided fordrug urine testing in subpart H of this part, except that the test resultreported to the railroad representative shall include both a urine alcoholconcentration and an estimate of blood alcohol concentration as derivedin the manner discussed in appendix D.(4) The employee shall be given an opportunity to provide a blood samplefor alcohol analysis as set forth in andSection;219.303. If the employeeprovides a blood sample, the lower of the actual blood alcohol concentrationand the estimate derived from the urine alcohol level shall be consideredin relation to any discipline or other adverse action taken against theemployee.(b) <T3>Laboratory analysis and reporting.</T3> (1) The urine sample shallbe screened by a method that reliably detects alcohol in the urine at aconcentration of .05 percent (w/v), and a concentration equal to or greaterthan that value shall be considered presumptively positive subject to confirmation.The screening run shall include at least 10% quality control samples. Ifthe screening method uses prepared reagents, they shall meet the requirementsof the Food and Drug Administration for commercial distribution.(2) Any presumptive positive shall be confirmed by gas chromatography witha suitable internal standard. The confirmation run shall include ethanolstandards, at least one blank specimen, and at least one control purchasedcommercially or provided through an external quality control program. Resultsdeclared positive on confirmation shall be consistent with pre-establishedcriteria for retention times of internal and external standards. Urinealcohol concentration shall be reported only at values of .05 percent orgreater within the linear portion of the standard curve. Unconfirmed presumptivepositive results and urine alcohol values below .05 percent shall be reportedas negative.(3) If both screening and confirmation are performed by gas chromatography,confirmation shall be conducted on a second column to ensure specific identificationof ethanol. t. Amend andSection;219.309 by revising paragraphs (b)(2) and (b)(3) to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;219.309</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Presumption of impairment; notice.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) * * *(2) The following statement provides the required notice: <ITAG tagnum="21">Under Federal Railroad Administration (FRA) safety regulations, youmay be required to provide a urine sample after certain accidents and incidentsor at any time the company reasonably suspects that you are under the influenceof, or impaired by, drugs while on duty. Because of its sensitivity, theurine test may reveal whether or not you have used certain drugs withinthe recent past (in a rare case, up to <T3>sixty</T3> days before the sample is collected). As a general matter,the test cannot distinguish between recent use off the job and currentimpairment. However, the Federal regulations provide that if only the urinetest is available, a positive finding on that test will support a presumptionthat you were impaired at the time the sample was taken.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">You can avoid this presumption of impairment by demanding to providea blood sample at the same time the urine sample is collected. The bloodtest will provide information pertinent to recency of use and current impairment.Regardless of the outcome of the blood test, if you provide a blood samplethere will be no presumption of impairment from a positive urine test.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If you have used any drug off the job (other than a medication thatyou possessed lawfully) in the prior sixty days, it may be in your interestto provide a blood sample. If you have not made unauthorized use of anydrug in the prior sixty days, you can expect that the urine test will benegative; and you may not wish to provide a blood sample. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Effective October 2, 1989, use of certain drugs (controlled substances)without medical authorization is prohibited by Federal regulation at anytime. Therefore, presence of such drugs in the urine may be evidence ofprohibited conduct, even if an optional blood test is negative. If a controlledsubstance is detected in the urine, you will be given an opportunity todiscuss any legitimate administration or use of the controlled substanceon a confidential basis with a Medical Review Officer.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">You are not required to provide a blood sample at any time, exceptin the case of certain accidents and incidents subject to Federal post-accidenttesting requirements (49 CFR part 219, subpart C).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A complete copy of the Federal regulations is available for your reviewat <T2>XXXXX</T2>.</ITAG>(3) The railroad shall include in this notice a statement of company policywith respect to the disciplinary consequences (if any) attendant to on-the-jobuse, possession or impairment and prohibited drug use as detected onlythrough a urine test.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection;219.403 and 219.405</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>u. Amend andSection;andSection;219.403(a) and 219.405(a) by adding ``and andSection;219.102''immediately following ``andSection;219.101'' in each section. v. Revise andSection;219.501 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;219.501</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Pre-employment drug screens.</ITAG>(a) On and after May 1, 1986, each applicant who is given favorable considerationfor a position with a railroad that involves the performance of coveredservice shall be tested for the presence of drugs prior to being employedin covered service. This requirement shall apply to final applicants foremployment and, effective January 16, 1990, to employees seeking to transferfrom non-covered service to duties involving covered service. The testshall be accomplished through analysis of a urine sample. Whenever feasible,the sample shall be obtained in connection with a pre-employment medicalexamination.(b) Prior to collection of the urine sample, the applicant shall be notifiedthat the sample will be tested for the presence of drugs. In the case ofan applicant who declines to be tested and withdraws the application foremployment, no record shall be maintained of the declination.(c) Effective January 16, 1990, the conduct of urine drug testing underthis subpart is governed by subpart H of this part and (to the extent notinconsistent with this part) part 40 of subtitle A of this title.(d) A railroad may test for alcohol in pre-employment tests under thissection under the following conditions:(1) Prior to the collection of the sample, the applicant shall be notifiedthat the sample will be tested for alcohol. In the case of an applicantwho declines to be tested and withdraws the application for employment,no record shall be maintained of the declination.(2) The test procedure shall utilize the same specimen analyzed for controlledsubstances, but the specimen bottle shall contain one percent sodium fluoride.(3) Except as provided in this section, chemical analysis for alcohol shallbe conducted according to the same standards required for reasonable causeurine alcohol testing in andSection;219.307 of this part.(4) The reporting cutoff shall be .10 percent (w/v) urine alcohol (equivalentto an attained blood alcohol concentration of approximately .07 percent),and any lower concentration shall be reported as negative. (5) Positive results shall be considered in the same manner for all applicants.(For instance, all applicants with a specified level shall be rejected;or all applicants testing positive shall be evaluated by a qualified physicianagainst professionally recognized standards in order to determine if theapplicant has an uncontrolled substance abuse disorder.) w. Revise andSection; 219.503 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.503 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notification; records. </ITAG>The railroad shall provide for medical review of laboratory test resultsand shall notify the applicant of the results of any test in the same manneras provided for employees in subpart H. Records shall be maintained confidentiallyand shall be retained in the same manner as required under Subpart H foremployee test records, except that such records need not reflect the identityof an applicant whose application for employment in covered service wasdenied.x. Revise andSection; 219.505 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.505 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Refusals; consequences of positive. </ITAG>(a) An applicant who has refused to submit to pre-employment testing underthis section shall not be employed in covered service based upon the applicationand examination with respect to which such refusal was made. This sectiondoes not create any right on the part of the applicant to have a subsequentapplication considered; nor does it restrict the discretion of the railroadto entertain a subsequent application for employment from the same person.(b) An applicant who is using a controlled substance without medical authorizationshall not be employed in covered service. This section shall not be construedto bar employment based on a subsequent application if the applicant nolonger uses a controlled substance without medical authorization. y. Amend andSection; 219.601 by republishing the introductory text of paragraph(b), and by revising paragraph (b)(6) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.601 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Railroad random testing programs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) <T3>Form of programs.</T3> Random testing programs submitted by or on behalfof each railroad under this subpart shall meet the following criteria,and the railroad and its managers, supervisors, officials and other employeesand agents shall conform to such criteria in implementing the program:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(6) An employee shall be subject to testing only while on duty in coveredservice (including any duty tour during which the employee is assignedto perform functions that normally involve covered service, whether ornot covered service is, in fact, performed during that particular dutytour). z. Amend andSection; 219.603 by removing paragraph (b)(3) and by revisingparagraph (c) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.603 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Participation in testing; refusals. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) Upon the expiration of the 9-month period described in this section,a railroad may permit the employee to return to covered service only underthe same conditions specified in andSection; 219.104 of this part. aa. Amend andSection; 219.605 by revising paragraph (b) to read as followsand by removing paragraphs (c), (d) and (e). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.605 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Positive test results; procedures </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) Procedures for administrative handling by the railroad in the eventa sample provided under this subpart is reported as positive by the MROare set forth in andSection; 219.104 of this part. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 219.607 and 219.609 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>bb. Remove andSection;andSection; 219.607 and 219.609. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 219.707 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>cc. Remove the fourth (final) sentence of andSection; 219.707(d). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;219.709 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>dd. Amend andSection; 219.709 by removing the word ``with'' in the thirdsentence of paragraph (a) and by inserting in lieu thereof the word ``within''.ee. Revise andSection; 219.711 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.711 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Confidentiality of test results. </ITAG>(a) A laboratory reporting results of tests conducted under this subpartshall report those results only to the designated Medical Review Officerof the railroad. The results shall not be disclosed by the laboratory toany other person, except that the laboratory may affirm the test resultto the employee to whom the sample was identified. This paragraph shallnot be read to bar normal access to analytical data for laboratory accreditationor certification processes, but records shall be maintained by specimenidentification number (or accession number) rather than employee name.(b) The MRO may not disclose medically approved drug use or administrationinformation obtained under this part (whether ascertained through testingor reported by the employee or the employee's medical practitioner at theemployee's request) to non-medical railroad personnel; however, nothingin this part bars use of such information by the railroad's medical officerin the context of an established medical qualifications program insofaras it may indicate an underlying physical disorder that requires evaluationunder the company's existing medical standards. (c) No record of tests conducted subject to this subpart or informationdrawn thereform shall be used or disseminated by the railroad or withinthe railroad for any purpose other than providing for compliance with thispart (and railroad rules consistent herewith), unless with the voluntarywritten consent of the employee. Such written consent shall specify theperson to whom the information may be provided. Each railroad shall adoptand implement procedures to guard this information against unauthorizeddisclosure both within and external to the railroad company. ff. Add a new andSection; 219.713 at the end of Subpart H to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 219.713 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reports; FRA access to records. </ITAG>(a) Each railroad shall retain for at least 2 years from the date of samplecollection all records of each test conducted under this subpart (withrespect to tests required or authorized under subparts D, F, or G of thispart) that is reported as positive by the Medical Review Officer, inlcudingurine custody and control forms, laboratory reports, and certificationstatements. Records of negative tests shall be retained for at least 1year. (b) Each railroad shall maintain for at least 5 years summary records ofemployee alcohol and drug test results conducted under this part (includingsubpart C) and rehabilitation (including primary treatment, aftercare,and follow-up alcohol/drug testing) for each covered employee. Recordsrequired to be kept shall be made available to FRA as provided by section208 of the Federal Railroad Safety Act of 1970. gg. Add a new appendix C is added to Part 219 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix C_Post-Accident Testing Sample Collection</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">1.0 General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This appendix prescribes procedures for collection of samples formandatory post-accident testing pursuant to subpart C of this part. Collectionof blood and urine specimens is required to be conducted at an independentmedical facility.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">(Surviving Employees)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">2.0 Surviving Employees</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This unit 2 provides detailed procedures for collecting post-accidenttoxicological samples from surviving employees involved in train accidentsand train incidents, as required by 49 CFR part 219, subpart C. SubpartC specifies qualifying events and employees required to be tested.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">2.1 Collection Procedures: General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">All forms and supplies necessary for collection and transfer of bloodand urine specimens for six surviving employees can be found in the FRApost-accident toxicology kit, which is made available to the collectionsite by the railroad representative. Each kit contains supplies for blood/urinecollections from six individuals, including instructions and necessaryforms. The railroad is responsible for ensuring that kit materials arefresh, complete and meet FRA requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">2.11 Responsibility of the Railroad Representative</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In the event of an accident/incident for which testing is requiredunder Subpart C, the railroad representative shall, upon arrival at theindependent medical facility, promptly make available to the medical facilityrepresentative a toxicology kit or kits and shall identify to the medicalfacility representative the instructions contained in the kit for conductof the collection. (Each kit contains supplies to collect samples fromsix employees.) The railroad representative shall request the medical facilityrepresentative to review the instructions provided (Exhibit C-1) and, throughqualified medical personnel, to provide for collection of the specimensaccording to the procedure set out.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The railroad representative shall undertake the following additionalresponsibilities_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Complete Form 6180.73 describing the testing event and identifyingthe employees whose samples are to be deposited in the toxicology kit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; As necessary to verify the identity of individual employees,affirm the identity of each employee to the medical facility personnel.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; To the extent consistent with the policy of the medical facilityand the privacy of the employee, follow the progress of the collectionprocedure.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Warnings: The railroad representative shall not observe urinationor otherwise disturb the privacy of urine donation. The railroad representativeshall not handle sample containers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">2.12 Employee Responsibility</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">An employee who is identified for post-accident toxicological testingshall cooperate in testing as require by the railroad and personnel ofthe independent medical facility. Such cooperation will normally consistof the following, to be performed as requested:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Provide a blood sample, which a qualified medical professionalor technician will draw using a single-use sterile syringe. The employeeshould be seated for this procedure.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Provide, in the privacy of an enclosure, a urine sample intoa single-use cup. The urine sample shall be presented to the medical facilitypersonnel.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Monitor the collection to ensure that the blood and urinesamples are properly identified and sealed before they leave your sight.Verify the sample and seal by placing your initials on the seal.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Complete necessary paperwork, including Steps 1 and 4 ofFRA Form 6180.74 (revised).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; If required by the medical facility, complete a separateconsent form for taking of the samples and their release to FRA for analysisunder the FRA rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>The employee may not be required to complete any form thatcontains any waiver of rights the employee may have in the employment relationshipor that releases or holds harmless the medical facility with respect tonegligence in the collection.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">2.2 The Collection</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Exhibit C-1 contains instructions for collection of samples for post-accidenttoxicology from surviving employees. These instructions shall be observedfor each collection. Instructions shall be contained in each collectionkit and shall be provided to medical facility personnel involved in thecollection and/or packaging of specimens for shipment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">(Post Mortem Collection)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">3.0 Fatality</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This unit 3 provides procedures for collecting post-accident bodyfluid/tissue samples from the remains of employees killed in train accidentsand train incidents, as required by 49 CFR Part 219, Subpart C. SubpartC specifies qualifying events and employees required to be tested.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">3.1 Collection</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In the event of a fatality for which testing is required under subpartC, the railroad shall promptly make available to the custodian of the remainsa copy of Exhibit C-2 to this appendix and a toxicology kit. The railroadrepresentative shall request the custodian to review the instructions containedin Exhibit C-1 and, through qualified medical personnel, to provide thespecimens as indicated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">(Surviving Employees and Fatalities)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">4.0 Shipment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The railroad is responsible for arranging overnight transportationof the sealed toxicology kit containing the specimens. Whenever possible,the kit should be delivered directly from the medical personnel providingthe specimens to an overnight express service courier. If it becomes necessaryfor the railroad to transport the kit from point of collection to pointof shipment, then_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. The kit shall be sealed by the medical personnel providing thespecimens before the kit is turned over to the railroad representative;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The railroad shall limit the number of persons handling the kitto the minimum necessary to provide for transportation;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. If the kit cannot immediately be delivered to the express carrierfor transportation, it shall be maintained in secure temporary storage;and</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. The railroad representatives handling the kit shall document chainof custody of the kit and shall make available such documentation to FRAon request.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Exhibit C-1_Instructions for Collection of Blood and Urine Specimens:Mandatory Post-Accident Toxicological Testing</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">A. Purpose</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">These instructions are for the use of personnel of medical facilitiesconducting collection of blood and urine samples from surviving railroademployees following railroad accidents and casualties that qualify formandatory alcohol/drug testing. The Federal Railroad Administration appreciatesthe participation of medical facilities in this important public safetyprogram.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">B. Prepare for Collection</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Railroad employees have consented to provision of samples for analysisby the Federal Railroad Administration as a condition of employment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A private, controlled area should be designated for collection ofspecimens and completion of paperwork.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Only one specimen should be collected at a time, with each employee'sblood draw or urine collection having the complete attention of the collectoruntil the specific sample has been labeled, sealed and documented.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Please remember two critical rules for the collections:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">All labeling and sealing must be done in the sight of the donor, withthe sample never having left the donor's sight until the sample has beenlabeled, sealed and initialled by the donor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Custody and control of blood and urine samples must be documentedon the forms provided. In order to do this it is important for the paperworkand the specimens to stay together.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">To the extent practical, blood collection should take priority overurine collection.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">You will use a single Post-Accident Testing Blood/Urine Custody andControl Form (FRA Form 6108.74 (revised)), consisting of six Steps to completethe collection for each employee. We will refer to it as the Control Form.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">C. Identify the Donor</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The employee donor must provide photo identification to each collector,or lacking this, be identified by the railroad representative.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The donor should remove all unnecessary outergarments such as coatsor jackets, but may retain valuables, including wallet. Donors should notbe asked to disrobe, unless necessary for a separate physical examinationrequired by the attending physician.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">D. Draw Blood</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Assemble the materials for collecting blood from each employee: two10 ml grey-stoppered blood tubes, the Control Form and an indelible marker.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Ask the donor to complete Step 1 on the Control Form.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">With the donor seated, draw two (2) 10 ml tubes of blood using standardmedical procedures (sterile, single-use syringe into evacuated gray-toptubes provided). Caution: Do not use alcohol or an alcohol-based swab tocleanse the venipuncture site.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Once both tubes are filled and the site of venipuncture is protected,immediately_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Seal and label each tube by placing a numbered blood specimenlabel from the label set on the Control Form over the top of the tube andsecuring it down the sides.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Ask the donor to initial each label. Please check to seethat the initials match the employee name and note any discrepancy in the``Remarks'' block of the Control Form.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Complete Step 2 on the form.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Skip to Step 5 and initiate chain of custody for the bloodtubes by filling out the first line of the block to show receipt of theblood samples from the donor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Keep the paperwork and specimens together. If another medicalfacility representative will be collecting the urine sample from this employee,transfer both the form and the blood tubes to that person, showing thetransfer of the blood tubes on the second line of Sept 5 (the chain ofcustody block).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">E. Collect Urine</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The urine collection agent should assemble at his/her station thematerials for collecting urine from each employee: one plastic collectioncup (covered with shrink wrap), one 125 ml polyethylene specimen bottlewith preservative (with protective seal), the Control Form, and an indeliblemarker.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">After requiring the employee to wash his/her hands, the collectionagent should escort the employee directly to the urine collection area.To the extent practical, all sources of water in the collection area shouldbe secured and a bluing agent (provided in the toxicology kit) placed inany toilet bowl, tank, or other standing water.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The employee will be provided a private place in which to void. Urinationwill not be directly observed. If the enclosure contains a source of runningwater that cannot be secured or any material (soap, etc.) that could beused to adulterate the specimen, the collection agent should monitor theprovision of the sample from outside the enclosure. Any unusual behavioror appearance should be noted in the remarks section of the Control Formor on the back of that form.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The collection agent should then proceed as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Unwrap the collection cup in the employee's presence and hand it tothe employee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Ask the employee to void at least 60 ml into the collection cup (atleast to the line marked). Leave the private enclosure.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If there is a problem with urination or sample quantity, see the ``TroubleBox'' at the back of these instructions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Once the void is complete, the employee should exit the private enclosureand deliver the specimen to the collection agent. Both the collection agentand the employee must proceed immediately to the labeling/sealing area,with the specimen never leaving the sight of the employee before beingsealed and labeled.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Upon receipt of the specimen, proceed as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; In the full view of the employee, remove the wrapper fromthe urine specimen bottle.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; As you pour the specimen into the specimen bottle, pleaseinspect for any unusual signs indicating possible adulteration or dilution.Secure the top. Note any unusual signs under ``remarks'' at Step 3 of theControl Form.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Within 4 minutes after the void, measure the temperatureof the urine by reading the strip on the bottle. Mark the result at Step3 of the Control Form.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If there is a problem with the urine sample, see the ``Trouble Box''at the back of these instructions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Place the numbered urine specimen label from the ControlForm label set over the top of the bottle and secure it to the sides.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Ask the donor to initial the label. Please check to see thatthe initials match the employee name and note any discrepancy in the ``Remarks''block of Step 3.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Complete the remainder of Step 3 on the Control Form.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Skip to Step 5 and initiate chain-of-custody by showing receiptof the urine sample from the donor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Keep the paperwork and specimens together. If another medicalfacility representative will be collecting the blood sample from this employeeor preparing the box for shipment, transfer both the form and the bloodtubes to that person, showing the transfer on the second line of Step 5(the chain of custody block).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">F. Complete Treatment Information.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Complete Step 6 of the Control Form.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">G. Prepare the kit for Shipment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The toxicology kit shall be prepared and sealed by a medical facilityrepresentative as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; To avoid unnecessary steps in the chain of custody, it ispreferred that one of the persons collecting urine/blood samples preparethe kit and do so immediately. If for some reason the kit cannot be preparedimmediately, samples should be secured; and placement in and removal fromsecure storage should be reflected on the chain of custody block at Step5 of the Control Form.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Inspect step 5 of each Control Form to ensure you are shownin receipt of blood and urine samples and that the chain of custody toyou is complete.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Put blood tubes in styrofoam tube holders to avoid breakage.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Do not use dry ice. Fill the quart metal can (provided) withwet ice, affix lid, and place in center of the kit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Place all forms and unused tamper-proof tape in zip-lockbag and seal securely. Place bag and unused supplies in kit, but keep themarker, green tape, label instruction, and kit seal.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Close kit around the closure with green tape provided. Affixkit seal at right angle to green tape and sign and date across seal withindelible marker provided.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Affix lable instruction provided to outside of kit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">H. Ship the kit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The railroad should arrange to have the kit shipped overnight airexpress or (if express service is unavailable) by air freight, prepaid,to FRA's designated laboratory. Whenever possible, the medical facilitycollection agent should deliver the kit directly into the hands of theexpress courier or air freight representative.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If courier service is not available after a certain hour in the eveningbut is available the next morning, the medical facility should retain thesamples in a secure refrigerated storage area until pick-up the next morning.Where courier pickup is not available at the medical facility where thesamples are taken, the railroad is required to transport the shipping kitto the nearest point of shipment via air express, air freight or equivalentmeans.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If railroad is given custody of kit to arrange shipment, please recordname of railroad official taking custody on the copy of the Form 6180.73(``Accident Information'') retained by the collection site.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">``Trouble Box'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Problem: </T3>The employee claims an inability to urinate, either becausehe/she has recently voided or because of anxiety concerning the collection.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Action: </T3>The employee may be offered moderate quantities of liquidto assist urination. If the employee continues to claim inability after4 hours, the urine collection should be discontinued, but the blood samplesshould be forwarded and all other procedures followed. Please note in areaprovided for remarks what explanation was provided by the employee. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Problem: </T3>The employee cannot provide approximately 60 ml of specimen.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Action: </T3>The employee should remain at the medical facility untilas much as possible of the required amount can be given (up to 4 hours).The employee may be offered moderate quantities of liquids to aid urination.The first bottle should be sealed and securely stored with the blood tubesand Control Form pending shipment and a second bottle should be used forthe subsequent void (using a second Control Form with the words ``SECONDVOID_FIRST SAMPLE INSUFFICIENT'' in the remarks block and labels from thatform). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. <T3>Problem: </T3>The urine temperature is outside the normal range of32.5^37.7 anddegrees;C/90.5^99.8 anddegrees;F, and a suitable medical explanationcannot be provided by an oral temperature or other means; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. <T3>Problem: </T3>The collection agent observes conduct clearly and unequivocallyindicating an attempt to substitute or adulterate the sample (e.g., substituteurine in plain view, blue dye in specimen presented, etc.) and a collectionsite supervisor or the railroad representative agrees that the circumstancesindicate an attempt to tamper with the sample. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Action: </T3>Document the problem on the Control Form. If the collectionsite supervisor or railroad representative concur that the temperatureof the specimen, or other clear and unequivocal evidence, indicates a possibleattempt to substitute or alter the specimen, another void should be takenunder direct observation by a collection agent of the same gender. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If a collection agent of the same sex is not available, do not proceedwith this step. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If a collection agent of the same gender is available, proceed asfollows: A new Control Form must be initiated for the second void. Theoriginal suspect specimen should be marked ``Void 1'' with the indeliblemarker and the follow-up void should be marked ``Void 2,'' with both voidsbeing sent to the laboratory and the incident clearly detailed on the ControlForm. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Exhibit C-2M Instructions for Collection of Post Mortem ToxicologySamples: Employee Killed in a Railroad Accident/Incident </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">To the Medical Examiner, Coroner, or Pathologist</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In compliance with Federal safety regulations (49 CFR part 219), arailroad representative has requested that you obtain samples for toxicologyfrom the remains of a railroad employee who was killed in a railroad accidentor incident. The deceased consented to the taking of such samples, as amatter of Federal law, by performing service on the railroad (49 CFR 219.11(f)).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Your assistance is requested in carrying out this program of testing,which is important to the protection of the public safety and the safetyof those who work on the railroads. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Materials</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The railroad will provide you a shipping kit that contains necessarysupplies, including a pen that will write directly on all surfaces. Ifthe kit is not immediately available, please proceed using supplies availableto you that are suitable for forensic toxicology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Samples Requested, in Order to Preference </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) <T3>Blood</T3>_20 milliliters or more. Preferred sites: intact femoralvein or artery or peripheral vessels (up to 10 ml, as available) and intactheart (20 ml). Deposit blood in gray-stopper tubes individually by siteand shake to mix specimen and preservative.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>If uncontaminated blood is not available, bloody fluid orclots from body cavity may be useful for qualitative purposes; but do notlabel as blood. Please indicate source and identity of sample on labelof tube.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) <T3>Urine</T3>_ as much as 125 milliliters, if available. Deposit intoplastic bottle provided and shake to mix specimen and preservative. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) <T3>Vitreous fluid</T3>_all available, deposited into smallest availabletube (e.g., 3 ml) with 1% sodium fluoride, or gray-stopper tube (provided).Shake to mix specimen and preservative. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) <T3>If available at autopsy, organs</T3>_50 to 100 grams each of two ormore of the following in order preference, as available: liver, bile, brain,kidney, spleen, and/or lung. Specimens should be individually depositedinto the sealable collection containers provided in the fatality kit andfrozen prior to shipment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) <T3>If vitreous or urine is not available, </T3>please provide_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. <T3>Spinal fluid</T3>_all available, in 8 ml container (if available) withsodium fluoride or in gray-stopper tube; or, if spinal fluid cannot beobtained, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. <T3>Gastric content_</T3>up to 100 milliliters, as available, into plasticbottle. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Sample Collection </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Sampling at time of autopsy is preferred so that percutaneous needlepuncturing is not necessary. However, if autopsy will not be conductedor is delayed, please proceed with sampling. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Blood samples should be taken by sterile syringe and deposited directlyinto evacuated tube, if possible, to avoid contamination of sample or dissipationof volatiles (ethyl alcohol).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note:</T4> If only cavity fluid is available, please open cavity tocollect sample. Note condition of cavity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Please use smallest tubes available to accomodate available quantityof fluid sample (with 1% sodium fluoride).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Sample Identification Sealing</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">As each sample is collected, please place an identifier label fromthe set attached to the Post Accident Testing Blood/Urine Custody and ControlForm (FRA Form 6180.74) on each container. Make sure the unique identificationnumber on the label matches the pre-printed number on the Control Form.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Annotate each label with sample description and source (as appropriate)(e.g., blood, femoral vein).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Seal each specimen with tamper-proof tape (provided).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Please provide copy of any written documentation regarding conditionof body and/or toxicology sampling procedure that is available at the timesamples are shipped.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Handling:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Samples other than blood (provided in evacuated tubes) may be immediatelyfrozen. Blood samples should be refrigerated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">All samples and documentation should be secured from unauthorizedaccess pending delivery for transporation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Information</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If the railroad has not already done so, please place the name ofthe subject at the top of the Control Form (step 1). You are requestedto complete step 2 of the form, annotating it by writing the word ``FATALITY,''listing the specimens provided, providing any further information under``Remarks.'' If it is necessary to transfer custody of the specimens fromthe person taking the specimens prior to preparing the kit for shipment,please use the blocks provided in step 5 to document transfer of custody.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The railroad representative will provide FRA Form 6180.73. Both formsshould be placed in the shipping kit when completed; but you may retainthe designated medical facility copy of each form for your records.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Packing the Shipping Kit</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Please put tubes in styrofoam tube holders to avoid breakage.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Do not use dry ice. Fill the quart metal can (provided) with wet ice,affix lid, and place in center of the kit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Place all forms and unused tamper-proof tape in zip-lock bag and sealsecurely. Place bag in kit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Seal kit with green tape provided and sign and date across seal withindelible marker provided.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Affix label instruction provided to outside of kit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If shipping by Federal Express, place strap inside the kit and insteadsecure the top with green vinyl tape provided. Otherwise, secure straparound lid.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Shipping the Kit</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The railway should arrange to have the kit shipped overnight air expressor (if express service is unavailable) by air freight, prepaid, to FRA'sdesignated laboratory. Whenever possible, deliver the kit directly intothe hands of the express courier or air freight representative.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If courier service is not available after a certain hour in the eveningbut is available the next morning, the medical facility should retain thesamples in a secure refrigerated storage area until pick-up the next morning.Where courier pickup is not available at the medical facility where thesamples are taken, the railroad is required to transport the shipping kitto the nearest point of shipment via air express, air freight or equivalentmeans.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If railroad is given custody of kit to arrange shipment, please recordname of railroad official taking custody.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Other Toxicology</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">FRA requests that the person taking the samples advise if additionaltoxicological analysis will be undertaken with respect to the fatality.FRA toxicology reports are available to the coroner or medical examineron request.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">hh. Add a new appendix D to part 219 to read as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix D_To Part 219 Procedure for Collection of Urine Alcohol Specimen</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The following procedures shall be followed where urine will be analyzedfor alcohol content under subpart D of this part:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. The employee should be instructed to provide an intitial samplein the manner provided in subpart H of this part, at the same time voidingthe bladder completely. The subject shall be advised that failure to completethe void may work to his/her disadvantage. (The collector shall documentthe time this sample and the subsequent sample are taken.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. After the passage of 20 minutes, the employee should be instructedto provide a second sample in the same manner provided under subpart H.If the employee has difficulty in providing the second sample, it may benecessary to wait until that is possible. Fluids may be offered to assistin the production of the sample.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The initial sample shall be used for controlled substance analysisas provided in subpart H of this part.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. The second sample shall be deposited into a single-use bottle containingone percent sodium fluoride as a preservative. This sample shall be identified,sealed and handled in the same manner provided under Subpart H and shallbe analyzed for alcohol as provided in Subpart D of this part. The laboratoryshall report the results exclusively to the Medical Review Officer as urinealcohol concentration (grams per 100 ml). Urine alcohol concentrationsbelow .05 are reported as negative.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. The Medical Review Officer may estimate BAC by dividing the urinealcohol concentration by 1.5 to produce an estimated average BAC for thetime between the void and the collection of the second sample.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. If the second BAC is under .05, the result may be taken to indicatethe presence of alcohol, but it should be recognized that reliable quantitationwill not be possible.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. In reviewing the urine alcohol result and reporting an estimatedBAC, the Medical Review Officer shall take into consideration any medicalreason that may have limited the ability of the donor to void the bladderupon providing the initial sample. If the Medical Review Officer determinesthat any alcohol present in the urine may have derived from ingestion andelimination into the bladder prior to the duty period, the MRO shall reportthe result as negative.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8. In reviewing the result, the MRO shall also take into considerationany medical condition that could make possible<T3> in vitro</T3> production of alcohol after provision of the sample.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 217_[AMENDED]</ITAG>1. The authority citation for part 217 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>45 U.S.C. 431, 437, and 438, as amended; Pub. L. 100-342;and 49 CFR 1.49(m).</ITAG>2. Amend part 217 by revising paragraph (d) of andSection; 217.13 to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 217.13</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Annual report.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) The number, type and result of each test and inspection related toenforcement of part 219 of this subchapter and the railroad's rule on alcoholand drug use (``Rule G''). This information shall be reported on Form FRA6180.77, shall be provided separately for employees covered by the Hoursof Service Act and other employees subject to the railroad's code of operatingrules and operational testing program, and shall include the following:(1) Total number of observations of individual employees (including observationsfor which breath, blood or urine tests were included and observations afteraccidents/incidents and rule violations) and total number of employeescharged with violation of Rule G or a similar rule.(2) Number of breath tests conducted under the authority of andSection; 219.301of this title and number of such tests that were positive; number of breathtests conducted under railroad authority for specific cause and not relyingon andSection; 219.301 and number that were positive.(3) Number of urine tests conducted under the authority of andSection; 219.301of this title and number of such tests that were positive; number of urinetests conducted under railroad authority for specific cause and not relyingon andSection; 219.301 and number that were positive. For positive testsindicate number for alcohol and for each of the following controlled substancedrug groups: marijuana, cocaine, phencyclidine, opiates, amphetamines,and other controlled substances.(4) Number of employees who refused to cooperate in testing under andSection;219.301; number of employees who refused to cooperate in testing underrailroad authority for specific cause and not relying on andSection; 219.301.(5) Number of blood tests demanded by employees in connection with suchobservations and results by substance (alcohol, controlled substance druggroup) (separated as to blood tests demanded under subpart D of this partand blood tests conducted under railroad authority).(6) Number and results of random drug tests conducted under the authorityof andSection; 219.601 of this chapter. For positive tests indicate the numberfor each controlled substance by drug group, and the following information:number and type of disciplinary actions taken, number of employees referredfor evaluation, number of employees evaluated as not requiring formal treatment,number of employees evaluated as requiring outpatient treatment, numberof employees evaluated as requiring inpatient treatment, number of employeesfailing to complete abatement or rehabilitation (as determined by clinicalof employees who completed abatement or rehabilitation determined afterinvestigation to have been involved in subsequent alcohol/drug disciplinaryoffenses, and number of follow-up tests and results by drug group (includingrefusals). Also indicate the number of refusals to cooperate in randomtesting and provide a summary of any negative test findings based uponscientific insufficiency (without personal identifying information).<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 225_[AMENDED]</ITAG>1. The authority citation for part 225 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>45 U.S.C. 38, 42, and 43, as amended; 45 U.S.C. 431,437, and 438, as amended; Pub. L. 100-342; and 49 CFR 1.49 (c) and (m).</ITAG>2. Amend part 225 by adding a new paragraph (d)(3) to andSection; 225.17to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 225.17</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Doubtful cases; alcohol or drug involvement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) * * *(3) For any train or non-train incident, the railroad shall provide anyavailable information concerning the possible involvement of alcohol ordrug use or impairment in such accident or incident.<ITAG tagnum="21">Issued in Washington, DC, on September 21, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Gilbert E. Carmichael,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Federal Railroad Administrator.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T2>Note: </T2>The following forms will not appear in the Code of FederalRegulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-06-M005</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-22798 Filed 9-22-89; 4:24 pm]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-06-M</ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>